INTRODUCTION TO "INFERNO"

{|INFERNO CANTO 01~}

	|Proemio.~ THIS canto, which serves as a general introduction to the
poem, is more formal in its allegory than those which follow;
it
affords, in some measure, a key to the whole interpretation. 
This announcement and summary of the whole ^Commedia~ may be
compared to the opening lines of the ^Aeneid~, the
^Pharsalia~,
and the ^Thebaid.~  The author has purposely enveloped its
incidents in a veil of mystery, which enhances its
impressiveness.

	It is the night of April 7, the night before Good Friday
in the great jubilee year 1300.  Dante, at the age of thirty-
five, suddenly becomes aware that he is astray in the dark
wood
of worldiness.  In terror he seeks refuge at the foot of the
mountain of rectitude, whose summit is lit by the rising sun. 
The sun, here and elsewhere, typifies enlightenment, perhaps
more
specifically, as Flamini suggests, righteous choice, the
intelligent use of the free will.  When Dante tries to scale
the
hill, three beasts beset his path, a leopard, a lion, and a
wolf
-- the same creatures that appear in Jer. v, 6: 'Wherefore a
lion
out of the forest shall slay them, and a wolf of the evenings
shall spoil them, a leopard shall watch over their cities:
every
one that goeth out thence shall be torn in pieces.' 
Apparently
he has a fair prospect of passing the first two, at least the
leopard, but the wolf drives him back.  These animals
evidently
stand for Dante's vicious habits, which prevent his reform. 
The
old commentators interpreted them respectively as luxury,
pride,
and avarice; this would imply (unless we understand the poet's
whole experience to be generic, not individual) that Dante's
dominant sin was avarice, which is scarcely believable.  A
modern
view, upheld by Flamini, is, in spite of some grave objections
far more satisfactory in itself and more in harmony with the
whole structure of the poem.  Inasmuch as the sins of Hell
fall
under the three heads, Incontinence, Violence, and Fraud, it
is
natural that the beasts should stand for corresponding
practices:
the ravening wolf is Incontinence of any kind, the raging lion
is
Violence, the swift and stealthy leopard is Fraud.  St. Thomas
and Richard of St. Victor, two of Dante's favorite authors,
saw
in the spotted pard a fit symbol of fraudulence.  We may
understand, then, from the episode, that Dante could perhaps
have
overcome the graver sins of Fraud and Violence, but was
unable,
without heavenly aid to rid himself of some of the habits of
Incontinence.

	At this crisis Reason, personified in Virgil, comes at
divine bidding, to the sinner's rescue.  He declares that
escape
is possible only by another route, which will lead them
through
Hell: we cannot run away from evil before we know what it
really
is; a rational understanding of human wickedness must precede
reformation.  The wolf, he says, is ravaging the world, and
will
continue to do so until a Hound shall appear and drive it back
into Hell, whence it first came.  This Hound is obviously a
redeemer who shall set the world aright.  If we compare this
passage with another prophecy in ^Purg.~ XXXIII, 40-45, it is
tolerably clear that he is to be a temporal rather than a
spiritual saviour -- a great Emperor whose mission it shall be
to
establish the balance of power, restore justice, and guide
erring
humanity.  Such an Emperor, destined to come at the end of the
world, was not unknown to legend; his advent appears to have
been
sometimes associated with the ^annus canicularis~, the period
of
Sirius, the Dog Star.  As the prediction was still unfulfilled
at
the time of writing, Dante naturally made it vague; in fact,
he
rendered Delphic obscurity doubly obscure by adding the
mysterious words 'tra Feltro e Feltro.'  We know that the poet
entertained great hopes of the youthful leader, Can Grande
della
Scala, in Dante's last years the chief representative of the
Imperial power in Italy.  It is possible that he so
constructed
his prognostication as to make its application to Can Grande
evident in case those hopes should be realized, but not
obtrusive
in case they were not.  'Veltro' easily suggests Can Grande;
'Feltro e Feltro' may point to the towns of Feltre and Monte
Feltro.  Dante's conception of the just Emperor was perhaps
influenced by current stories of the Grand Khan of Tartary,
who
was said to despise wealth and to live simply in a 'felt'
tent,
and whose title had a strange likeness to the name of the
Imperial Vicar General.

	For the allegory of the beasts, see Flamini, II, 115 ff.
For the Veltro: V. Cian, ^Sulle orme del Veltro~, 1897; A.
Bassermann, ^Veltro, Gross-Chan und Kaisersage~, 1902, and
also
^Studien zur vergleichenden Literaturgeschichte~, VIII, 5
(where
Bassermann points out a strange similarity between Dante's
phraseology and that of a passage in the Alexandrian Greek
prophecies called ^Oracula Sibyllina~).  The interpretation
and
the coinage of prophecy had a great vogue in the 13th and 14th
centuries; A. Scolari, ^Il Messia dantesco~, 1913 (cf.
^Bull.~,
XX, 89); G. Fregni, ^Sul veltro allegorico di Dante~, 1913; H.
Matrod, ^Le Veltro de Dante et son DXV Khan et Can (Extrait
des
$Etudes Franciscaines~), 1913: the Veltro was suggested by the
Grand Khan of Tartary, whose title seems to be identical with
^Cane~ or with ^Can Grande~; the Tartars were swift as hounds,
they lived in felt tents, they used no money, and they lifted
their Emperor to the throne on a piece of felt.  In the second
half of the 13th century, Europeans generally believed that
the
Tartars had become Christians, and there were tales of a great
Christian Emperor and Empress of Tartary; about 1300, indeed,
there was a widely circulated report that the Tartars had
taken
Jerusalem to restore it to the Christians.  These stories
combined with the old belief in a great Emperor to come at the
end of the world; and with the idea of the year of the Dog
Star,
Sirius.

{|INFERNO CANTO 02~}

	|Proemio.~ AS this canto opens, it is the evening of Good Friday,
April 8; twelve hours have been consumed in the attempt to
scale
the mountain, the encounter with the beasts, and the
conversation
with Virgil.  The world is going to rest, and Dante, 'all
alone'
among the creatures of this earth, is preparing for a stern
and
fearful task.  At this point -- really the beginning of the
^Inferno~, inasmuch as the first canto is a general
introduction
to the poem -- Dante invokes the Muses, following the example
of
the great poets of old.  Dante probably believed that the
Muses,
even to the ancients, were only a figure of speech, a metaphor
for poetic inspiration or art; so in the ^Vita Nuova~, XXV,
88,
he says that Horace, calling upon the Muse, 'parla... alla sua
scienza medesima.'

	Doubting his fitness for the proposed journey, Dante
recalls his two great predecessors, Aeneas and St. Paul, to
whom the realms of the departed were revealed.  The former, as
the sixth book of the ^Aeneid~ relates, visited the lower
world; the latter 'was caught up into Paradise,' as he tells
us
in 2 Cor. xii.  The one listened to prophecies of Rome's
future
greatness; the other 'heard unspeakable words, which it is not
lawful for a man to utter.'  The experience of Aeneas prepared
the way for the Empire, the 'alto effetto' or 'mighty result'
of
his vision; the rapture of St. Paul strengthened the faith
which
sustains the Church.  Dante has no such mission, he merely
represents the ordinary run of humanity: why should such a
revelation be made to him?

	It is worth noting that in introducing the example of
Aeneas, Dante begins with 'tu dici che ... ,' and a few lines
further on he uses the phrase 'questa andata onde gli dai tu
vanto'; so in ^Par.~ XV, 26, referring to the same episode, he
adds 'se fede merta nostra maggior Musa,' meaning Virgil. 
These
expressions seem to imply a mental reservation with regard to
the
literal veracity of Aeneas's adventure.  In ^Conv.~, II, i, he
makes it clear that in poetry truth is to be sought not in the
letter but in the allegory, which he calls 'una verit@a ascosa
sotto bella menzogna.'  The sixth book of the ^Aeneid~, then,
is allegorically true, in that it records revelations made to
the
hero, but in its material details it may be regarded as
fiction. 
In ^Aen.~, VI, 893-8, Anchises lets his son out through the
ivory gate of deceptive dreams; and Servius, in his commentary
explains this incident as an indication that the whole story
is
an invention.

	To strengthen Dante's wavering courage, Virgil assures
him that the experience vouchsafed him is a fruit of the
Divine
Care which watches lovingly over erring man as long as hope is
left.  In dramatic fashion he tells how Mary, pitying Dante's
plight called upon Lucia (presumably St. Lucia of Syracuse),
who,
in turn, summoned Beatrice to his aid; she sought out Virgil
in
the Limbus and sent him to rescue the struggling sinner.  On
hearing this, Dante takes heart again, and follows his master
into the earth.  The three ladies form a counterpart to the
three
beasts.  The Virgin, here as generally in Christian thought,
symbolizes divine Mercy.  Lucia has by almost all interpreters
been regarded as the emblem of Grace -- probably, as her name
suggests, Illuminating Grace; inasmuch as Mary describes Dante
to
Lucia as 'il tuo fedele,' it would seem that our poet, for
reasons unknown to us, had held this saint in particular
veneration.  Beatrice, as we have seen, stands for Revelation,
for which Dante's distorted mind must be prepared by Reason. 
God
in his mercy sends forth his illuminating grace to prepare the
way for complete revelation, which will ensue as soon as the
reawakened voice of reason shall have made the sinner ready to
receive it.

	There was another St. Lucy, Lucia degli Ubaldini (sister
of the Cardinal), nun in the convent of Monticelli, where was
Piccarda, sister of Dante's friend, Forese Donati (^Purg.~
XXIV,
13-15; ^Par.~ III, 34-120).  Her day was May 30, which may
have
been Dante's birthday.  Perhaps this coincidence was a cause
of
the poet's devotion to the great St. Lucia of Syracuse.  See
Moore, IV, 235.

	For the symbolism of the three ladies, see Flamini, II,
149
ff.  It should be recorded that so distinguished a commentator
as
Torraca regards Beatrice, Lucia and Mary as emblems of the
three
Christian virtues, Faith Hope and Charity -- an interpretation
that seems to meet with a fatal obstacle in ^Purg.~ XXIX,
121-9,
where these virtues are manifestly represented by three
nymphs.
Parodi identifies May with 'Gratia preveniens,' Lucia with
'Gratia cooperans' or 'illuminans.' -- See J. B. Fletcher,
^Dante,
Aeneas, St. Paul~, Todd Memorial Volumes, I, 1930, p. 153; A.
H. Krappe, ^Santa Lucia~, Aquila, 1926.

{|INFERNO CANTO 03~}

	|Proemio.~ A SOLEMN inscription over the open gate of Hell arouses
Dante's apprehensions, but he is led on by his master into a
place full of darkness and the confused wail of countless
tortured souls.

	The part of the lower world on which they enter is the
abode of the lukewarm, who were neither good nor bad, and
contributed nothing to society.  Here, presumably, are to be
found those who were given over to acedia, or sloth, one of
the
seven capital sins.  To one of Dante's intense activity and
positiveness of judgment these are the most contemptible of
all
creatures.  To him they are as the Laodiceans, 'neither cold
nor
hot.'  'So then,' says Rev. iii, 16, 'because thou art
lukewarm,
and neither cold nor hot, I will spue thee out of my mouth.'
Both Heaven and Hell reject them.  Not one of them does Dante
mention by name.  Their punishment describes them: as he who
will
attach himself to neither party must be continually shifting
sides, the lukewarm are depicted eternally rushing to and fro
after an aimlessly dodging banner; as he who loves his ease is
more annoyed by trifles than is the magnanimous man by severe
trials, we see the sluggards tormented by flies and wasps,
which
seem to them worse than any other punishment.

	Between this vestibule and the real Hell flows the
Acheron, whose bank is crowded with lost souls ready to be
ferried over by Charon, the ancient boatman.  The personages
of
ancient mythology had come to be regarded as demons in the
Christian scheme; similarly, Christianity, at an earlier date,
had taken over such figures as Beelzebub and Lucifer.  By
Charon,
as by most of the spirits whom he meets in Hell, Dante is
immediately recognized as a living man; although these
uncorporeal creatures have all the appearance of bodies, can
be
seen, heard, and (in Hell) even touched, and possess the same
senses as those in the flesh, there from them.  Charon,
moreover,
discerns -- perhaps by virtue of his office -- that Dante is
one
of the elect, and therefore refuses to carry him in his boat. 
Divine intervention mysteriously helps the poet on his way.  A
sudden earthquake similar to that which preceded the descent
of
Christ, frightens Dante into a swoonand when he recovers
consciousness, he is on the other side of Acheron, at the edge
of
the abyss.  Thus the sinner who is trying to better himself,
and
meets apparently insuperable obstacles is carried past them,
he
knows not how, by a higher power.

	For a discussion of the infernal darkness, see G. B.
Grassi, ^Le tenebre nell'"Inferno" di Dante~, in ^Giorn.
dant.~, XI, 1.  The punishment of the lukewarm by flies and
wasps
may be compared to the plague of locusts described in Rev. ix,
3-6.  These are the souls depicted in Michelino's famous
picture
in the Florentine cathedral.

{|INFERNO CANTO 04~}

	|Proemio.~ A THUNDER clap announces the consummation of the miracle. 
Dante finds himself on the brink of the cliff that surrounds
the
dark abyss.  A 'roar of countless wails' greets his ear.  At
this
sound, Virgil, who later in the journey sternly rebukes Dante
for
his sympathy with the damned, himself turns pale with pity:
while
Reason, face to face with sin, can feel only abhorrence, it
may
well be moved to anguish by contemplation of sin's
consequences.

	The descent of the bank brings the poets to the first
circle of Hell, the Limbus.  The Church fathers defined the
Limbus as an underground place, near Hell and Purgatory, the
abode of the souls of unbaptized children and, until the
Harrowing of Hell, of the virtuous members of the Old Church;
the
only punishment is exile from God's presence; the patriarchs
were
cheered by hope of ultimate rescue.  Salvation can be won only
through faith in Christ: the ancient Hebrews believed in
Christ
to come, Christians believe in Christ already descended and
arisen.  Admission to community with Christ, which redeems man
from original sin, must be sanctified by prescribed rites --
in
Christian times by baptism.

	After the crucifixion Christ went down into Hell, --
breaking the gates, which have ever since remained open, --
and
took from Limbus the souls of the worthy people of the Old
Testament.  The doctrine of the Harrowing of Hell is
foreshadowed
in Messianic tradition.  In the Bible only passing references
to
it are to be found: as in Ephesians iv, 9; 1 Epistle of Peter
iii, 19 and iv, 6; also, according to St. Augustine, in Ps.
cvii
(Vulgate cvi), 14.  It is mentioned in the apocryphal Gospel
of
Peter and described in the apocryphal Gospel of Nicodemus.

	It remained for Dante to place in his Limbus the souls of
virtuous pagans.  These, as they had never believed in Christ,
were not saved, but remained with the unbaptized infants. 
Only
Cato of Utica, who appears in the first canto of the
^Purgatorio~, was apparently released, and is working out his
salvation on the Island of Purgatory; how his entrance into
the
Church is to be effected we are not told.  It is interesting
to
note that in the ^Aeneid~, VI, 426-9, the children are on the
outer edge of the lower world -- 'infantumque animae flentes
in
limine primo.'

	Dante's Limbus is shrouded in darkness and the air
quivers with sighs.  Such is the life of those devoid of true
knowledge of God: their minds are enveloped in ignorance and
their hearts are full of a vague longing forever unsatisfied. 
But those among them who combine wisdom with virtue are
illumined
by mortal intellgence -- a light dim compared with the vision
of
God, but bright beside the obscurity in which their less
gifted
fellows dwell.  The state of the heathen sages of old is
symbolized by the 'nobile castello,' the Palace of Wisdom (or,
as
some understand it of Fame) where the great souls congregate,
'neither happy nor sad,' enjoying the companionship of their
peers and the light of human knowledge.  In the noble castle
are
the 'Magnanimi,' as opposed to the 'Pusillanimi' of the
Antinferno.  Cf. ^Conv.~, I xi 130-151.  Dante's description
of
them is reminiscent of Virgil's Elysian Fields in ^Aen.~, VI,
637 ff.

	J. B. Fletcher sees in the Noble Castle also an allegory
of pagan Rome, destined for the eagle flight but as yet
destitute
of the light of truth; he works out this ingenious conception
in
detail in ^Dante's School of the Eagle~, in ^Romanic Review~,
XXII, 191.

	For a discussion of the Limbus, see M. Scherillo in
^Bull.~, VIII, i; for the palace, A. Fiammazzo, ^Intorno al
"Nobile Castello~ " ^Giorn. dant.~, VIII, 25; for the descent
of
Christ into Hell, M. Dods, ^Forerunners of Dante~, 1903, pp.
83
ff.; W. H. Hulme, ^Harrowing of Hell~, 1907, pp. lxlxx (Early
English Text Society, Extra Series C).

{|INFERNO CANTO 05~}

	|Proemio.~ IN this canto are found several striking similes drawn
from birdlife, which Dante loved to depict.  The second
circle,
with its wind-wafted spirits, offers fit opportunity for these
portrayals of starlings, cranes, and doves.  Cranes are put to
a
like use by Virgil in ^Aen.~, X, 64-6:

     'Quales sub nubibus atris
     Strymoniae dant signa grues, atque aethera tranant
     Cum sonitu, fugiuntque Notos clamore secundo.'

Torraca quotes from the ^Tesoro~ of Bruetto Latini as follows:

     'Gru sono uccelli che volano a squadre, a modo di cavalieri
     che vanno in battaglia.'  The eager flight of the dove to
     her young was noted later by Rabelais (^Pantagruel~, IV,
     iii): 'Il n'est que vol de pigeon, quand il a oeufz ou
     petitz, pour l'obstin$ee sollicitude en lui par nature
     pos$ee de recourir et secourir ses pigeonneaux.'

	The descent from Limbus to the second circle is not
described; we have no means of conjecturing the size or the
steepness of the cliff.  The journey through Hell being
physically impossible, Dante purposely refrains from
furnishing
particulars that might destroy the illusion, while abounding
in
such details as serve to heighten it.  As the pit narrows
progressively toward the bottom, the terraces correspondingly
decrease in circumference, but the penalties become more and
more
severe.  At one point in the round of this shelf is a break,
where the rock has fallen.  When Dante mentions this ^ruina~,
in l. 34, he offers no explanation: shrieks and curses are
redoubled here, but we know not why.  Our suspense lasts until
we
reach Canto XII, ll. 31-45.  There we are told that when
Christ
descended into Hell, his coming was preceded by an earthquake,
which shook down the walls of the abyss in three spots.  Mat.
xxvii, 51: 'And behold, the veil of the temple was rent in
twain
from the top to the bottom; and the earth did quake, and the
rocks rent.'  Those broken places lie beside the circle of the
pagans just beyond the enclosure of the heretics, and over the
hypocrites by whom Christ had been condemned (XXI, 112-4;
XXIII
133-8) -- all close to the abodes of those who had offended
the
Saviour by disbelief in his mission.  In each case the word
'ruin' is used.  The sight of the first ^ruina~ moves the
souls
of the second circle to lamentation, because it reminds them
of
the time when the neighboring Hebrew spirits in the Limbus
were
rescued, while all the other souls in Hell were left to
eternal
torment.

	Most of the fallen angels, or fiends, are in the lower
Hell; a few, however, appear as presiding genii outside the
City
of Dis: so Charon, Cerberus, Plutus, Phlegyas, and, at the
threshold of the second circle, Minos, the judge.  Both
theologians and simple folk were prone to look upon the
heathen
gods as demons who had beguiled men into their worship.  It is
not strange, therefore to find in a Christian Hell many
classic
personages, especially such as were already associated with
the
lower world.  Dante did not treat all the pagan divinities
alike;
if he depicted Plutus as a dei, the Muses and Apollo were to
him
simply allegorical figures, while Jove apparently represented
the
ancient poets' dim conception of the Supreme Being.  Minos,
the
great king and legislator of Crete, holds in the 11th book of
the
^Odyssey~ the noble office of judge of the dead.  In the
^Aeneid~, VI, 432-3, though briefly sketched, he retains the
same honorable function:

     'Quaesitor Minos urnam movet: ille silentum
     Conciliumque vocat, vitasque et crimina discit.'

In Dante he has become a hideous demon, arbiter of the damned --
the symbol, it would seem, of the guilty conscience.

	The second circle punishes ^lussuria~, or lust, the first
of the sins of Incontinence.  The luxurious are forever blown
about in the darkness by stormy blasts, typifying the blind
fury
of passion.  In some previous tales of Hell a wind torments
evildoers, notably in the ^Visio Alberici~, XIV, where souls
are
driven by the fiery breath of a dog and a lion.  Dante divests
the torment of all grotesqueness, and, indeed, treats the
sinners
of this class with special consideration.  This may be due in
part to sympathy, and partly, no doubt, to a sense that their
fault is the result of a mistaken following of love, the
noblest
of human emotions.  Theologically speaking, the fate of lost
souls should arouse no pity, as the sight of sin should excite
only repugnance.  But we must remember that the Dante who is
visiting Hell is himself still a sinner.  Moreover,
allegorically
interpreted, these harassed souls are men and women loving and
suffering on earth; and even the most sinful, as long as they
live, are fit objects of compassion.

	Compassion, tenderness, sympathetic curiosity, anguish,
reach their climax when Dante meets and converses with
Francesca
da Rimini.  This unhappy lady was the daughter of Guido Minore
da
Polenta, a powerful citizen of Ravenna, and was married to
Giovanni di Malatesta da Verrucchio (called Sciancato, or Gian
Ciotto), master of Rimini.  Of her love for Paolo, her
husband's
brother, and the murder of the two by Giovanni, we have no
record
before Dante, although the event must have been well known. 
It
probably occurred about 1285: when Dante was eighteen, in
1282-3,
Paolo was for five months in Florence as Capitano del Popolo;
he
is not mentioned among Malatesta's sons in 1287; and in 1288
there is evidence of a child born to Giovanni by a second
wife. 
In 1285 Paolo was some 35 years old, had been married sixteen
years, and had two children; Francesca had one child.  Paolo's
daughter married a son of Aghinolfo of Romena.  After
Francesca's
adventure had been made eternally famous by Dante's poem, many
fables grew up about it; her fate is still a favorite theme
for
artists and authors.  Of all the episodes in the ^Commedia~,
this
has always been the most popular.

	It is not alone the undying passion of Francesca that
moves us, but even more her gentleness and modest reticence. 
In
her narrative she names none of the participants; not even her
city is called by name.  Her identity is revealed by Dante,
who,
recognizing her, addresses her as 'Francesca.'  Everything in
her
story that could mar our pity is set aside, and nothing
remains
but the quintessence of love.  Amid the tortures of Hell,
where
all is hatred, her love does not forsake her, and she glories
in
the thought that she and Paolo shall never be parted.

	Should we be inclined to question whether mere impersonal
sympathy, however natural and profound, could have sufficed to
lead a religious poet, a stern moralist, thus to idealize an
adulteress and mitigate her punishment, we might feel
ourselves
justified in seeking some special reason for his kindliness. 
As
we look through the ^Commedia~, we find that in one place or
another the exiled poet contrived to pay an appropriate
tribute
to all those who had befriended him in his need: it was the
only
return his grateful heart could make.  His last and probably
his
happiest years were spent in Ravenna under the protection of
Guido Novello da Polenta, himself a poet, a nephew of our
Francesca.  Now, we do not know exactly when Dante went to
that
city, but in any case it was almost certainly at a period
later
than the time when the ^Inferno~ was composed.  His son
Pietro,
however, established himself in Ravenna, perhaps as early as
1317, receiving a benefice from Guido's wife; and his daughter
Beatrice entered a convent there.  It is possible that
previous
courtesies, of which we have no record, were extended to Dante
or
his kindred before this ^cantica~ was completed.  Guido Minore
da
Polenta, Francesca's father, was ^podest@a~ of Florence in
1290,
when Dante was 25.  There is, then, some slight ground for the
supposition that this passage was intended as an incidental
homage to Guido's family (there being no other tribute to it
in
the poem), a rehabilitation of Francesca's memory.  Love, she
says, comes to gentle hearts with irresistible force -- 'a
nullo
amato amar perdona.'  Had she lived, she would have repented;
it
was her sudden taking off that damned her.  Her fate is
contrasted with that of her husband: her soul is one of the
highest in Hell; his, one of the lowest.

	This canto is an excellent example of Dante's creative
imagination.  His emotion once stirred, he conjured up a whole
scene in all its details.  So he did with the story of Count
Ugolino in ^Inf.~ XXXIII.

	See A. Graf ^La demonologia di Dante~ in his ^Miti,
leggend e superstizioni del medio evo~, 1892-3, II, 79.  For
Francesca, F. De Sanctis, ^Francesca da Rimini~ in his ^Nuovi
saggi critici~, 1893 (6th ed.); H. Morf, ^Galeotto fu il libro
e chi lo scrisse~, in ^Sitzungsberiche der k,oniglich
preussischen Akademie der Wissenschaften~, XLIII
(March 9, 1916); Paget Toynbee in ^5th Annual Report of the
Dante
Society of Cambridge, Massachusetts~ (1886), 42-72; P. Rajna
in
^Nuova Antologia~, 1920, 232.  For Dante's pity, D'Ovidio,
80-92;
Moore, II, 210 ff.; F. Cipolla in the ^Atti del Reale Istituto
Veneto~,
LIV, 294.

{|INFERNO CANTO 06~}

	|Proemio.~ FOR the reason already mentioned, Dante likes to pass
lightly over the transitions from one step to another.  Thus,
when he awakens from his second swoon, he finds himself once
more
mysteriously transported, this time to the third terrace.
Gluttony, the next of the sins of Incontinence, is essentially
foul and selfish, and so is fitly symbolized by the cold,
slimy
filth which constitutes the punishment of the third circle. 
It
is a sin that robs men of their humanity, making them
unrecognizable to their friends.  Its perfect embodiment is
Cerberus, the tormenting genius of the place.  This beast,
opposing the poets' passage, is offered a double handful of
mud,
which it eagerly devours.  So in the ^Aeneid~, VI, 417-23,
Cerberus is pacified by the Sibyl with a honey-cake:

     'Cerberus haec ingens latratu regna trifauci
     Personat, adverso recubans immanis in antro.
     Cui vates, horrere videns jam colla colubris,
     Melle soporatam et medicatis frugibus offam
     Objicit: ille fame rabida tria guttura pandens,
     Corripit objectam, atque immania terga resolvit
     Fusus humi, totoque ingens extenditur antro.'

The substitution of dirt for medicated sweets serves still
further to debase greediness.

	With one of the souls here confined Dante holds converse.
This is Ciacco, a Florentine renowned both for his gluttony
and
for his cleverness, who figures also in one of Boccaccio's
tales,
^Decameron~, IX, 8.  It is not certain whether ^Ciacco~ was
his
real name -- perhaps a synonym of Jacopo -- or a nickname
meaning
'pig'; nor is it known whether he is to be identified with a
poet
called Ciacco dell' Anguillaia.  In response to a question by
Dante, this spirit prophesies the approaching victory of the
Whites -- the ^selvaggia~ or 'rustic' party -- over their
opponents, and the ensuing triumph of the Blacks through the
connivance of Boniface VIII.  In Florence, he further
declares,
there are only two just men, and they have no influence.  Who
these two are, we are not told.  A comparison with the close
of
Canzone IX -- in which Dante sends his song 'to the three
least
guilty of our city' -- and with ^Purg.~ XVI 124-6 (where the
only
three good men now left in Lombardy are named), makes it
likely
that the poet had in mind two specific persons; but it is
impossible to guess whom he meant.

	In ll. 35-6 Dante speaks of walking over the empty shades
which look like real people.  Throughout Hell the souls,
though
without weight, are not only visible and audible, but
tangible.
On the lower slopes of the mountain of Purgatory, however,
Dante
cannot touch a shade (^Purg.~ II, 79 ff.), although two
spirits
can still embrace (^Purg.~ VI, 75); and near the summit one
soul
apparently cannot clasp another (^Purg.~ XXI, 130 ff.).  In
^Purg.~ XXV 79 ff. we are informed that after death the
atmosphere collects around the departed spirit, forming an
aerial
body, which reflects all the emotions of the soul itself. 
Although Dante nowhere says so explicitly, it would seem that
he
chose to regard this airy shape as more substantial in
proportion
to its proximity to the centre of gravity of the universe
(which
is also the centre of sin), and more ethereal as it rises
above
the earth's surface.  This conception of the shade appears to
be
Dante's own, although we find that St. Thomas mentions the
power
of angels and devils to assume aerial forms.

	See M. Scherillo, ^Il "Ciacco della Divina Commedia~, in
^Nuova Antologia~ (1901), XCIV, 427; cf. Bull., X, 186.  See
also
I. Del Lungo, ^Il Priorato di <ante>~, in ^Nuova Antologia~
(1900), LXXXIII, 3.  For the 'giusti son duo' of l. 73, see
Gen.
xviii, 24: 'Peradventure there be fifty righteous within the
city.'  For the solidity of shades: G. Gargano-Cosenza, ^La
saldezza delle ombre nel poema dantesco~, 1902, and R.
Petrosemolo, ^La saldezza delle ombre nella Divina Commedia~,
1902; cf. ^Bull.~, X, 79.

{|INFERNO CANTO 07~}

	|Proemio.~ PLUTUS, the symbol of wealth, an inflated, puffy-faced
monster, is as unsubstantial as he seems gigantic; when
thwarted,
he collapses and falls in a heap.  Virgil addresses him, in l.
8, as 'maladetto lupo.'  Similarly in ^Purg.~ XX, 10, Dante
exclaims, in the circle of avarice and prodigality: 'Maladetta
sie tu, antica lupa!'  These two passages afford strong
support
for the interpretation of the wolf in Canto I as avarice.  The
arguments on the other side seem, however, conclusive; it is
probably safe to assume that the wolf, in Dante's mind, always
signified Incontinence, either in the abstract or in some one
of
its forms -- and of these avarice is by far the most important
and injurious.  The swarm of the money-lovers is greater than
any
other in Dante's Hell, as it was in Virgil's (^Aen.~, VI,
610-11):

     'Aut qui divitiis soli incubuere repertis
     Nec partem posuere suis, quae maxima turba est.'

The fourth circle contains both misers and spendthrifts --
those
who showed no moderation in the use of worldly goods, but
handled
them so 'undiscerningly' that they are themselves made
indistinguishable, 'darkened beyond discernment,' their
individuality being sunk in their vice.  The insulting cries
which they exchange -- 'Why hoard?' 'Why squander?' --
proclaim,
or 'bark,' their sin clearly enough.  So the usurers, in Canto
XVII, are altered beyond recognition, and can be picked out
only
by their moneybags.  As Dante comes down among the sinners of
the
fourth shelf, the avaricious, as the more despicable, are on
his
left, the prodigal on his right.  The 'clenched fist' is the
sign
of greed; the 'cropped hair,' of lavishness.  Clerics form a
large part of the miserly host; Dante was by no means alone in
regarding avarice as the besetting fault of the clergy.  In
this
canto we find none of the gentleness with which our poet
treats
the amorous; even the gluttonous receive more consideration. 
The
verses bristle with derisive terms: ^cozzi~, ^zuffa~, ^ontoso
metro~,
^rabbuffa.~  As in ^Aen.~ VI 616 'saxum ingens volvunt alii,'
so
these two classes of sinners, each traversing one-half the
ring,
roll huge weights, pushing with might and main 'by strength of
chest,' the misers moving toward the right, the spendthrifts
toward the left.  When they reach a spot in front of Dante,
they
clash together; then, with mutual execration, they turn about
and
laboriously work their way to the opposite side of the ring,
where the encounter is repeated.  And so the weary, futile
round
goes on to all eternity, a fit image of the incessant and
useless
efforts of humanity to transfer worldy possessions.

	For this transfer God created a special minister,
Fortune, a power similar to the celestial intelligences that
move
the heavens.  She may be called the Angel of Earth.  It is her
mission to shift prosperity to and fro, without apparent plan,
seeing that it remain not too long with one person, family, or
nation.  In many of his utterances about Fortune, Dante
evidently
follows Boethius, in whom, as later in Albertus Magnus, there
appears not only the pagan but also a distinctly Christian
conception of her as God's instrument; but her rank as an
angelic
intelligence is bestowed by Dante himself.

	Cutting across this circle, the poets find a stream that
pours down over the edge to the terrace below; they keep close
to
this torrent, and so descend to the fifth shelf.  Here the
brook
feeds a vast swamp, filled with muddy figures, all intent on
mangling one another.  Thus foul wrath pictures itself.  These
souls fare no better, at Dante's hands, than their immediate
predecessors: their marsh is a 'puddle,' they 'gurgle in their
gullets' and 'guzzle mud.'  Aristotle, in his ^Ethics~, IV, v
--
and, after him, St. Thomas, both in his commentary on
Aristotle
and in his ^Summa Theologiae~, Prima Secundae, Qu. xlvi, Art.
8, and Secunda Secundae, Qu. clviii, Art. 5 -- divided the
wrathful into three classes: the ^acuti~, or quick-tempered;
the
^amari~, or sullen; the ^difficiles~ (also called ^graves~),
or
vindictive.  The ^acuti~ are evidently the sinners on the top
of
the pool; but below in the mire, so we are told, are others,
whose presence is indicated only by the bubbles they send to
the
surface.  These are the ^amari~ and not improbably the
^difficiles~ as well -- although Flamini would consign the
latter
to the City of Dis.  Inasmuch as these sunken spirits are said
to
harbor 'sluggish fumes' or the 'fumes of sloth' ('accidioso
fummo'), some commentators regard this marsh-bottom as the
regular abode of acedia or sloth, one of the seven capital
sins,
which in Purgatory has a circle to itself.  But acedia is a
disposition, not an act: in so far as it leads to cowardice or
indifference, it belongs to the ^Antinferno~; when it
manifests
itself as sullenness, that sullenness is punished in the bog. 
As
Brunetto Latini says in his ^Tesoretto~, Cap. XXI, 145 ff.:

     'In ira nasce e posa
     Accidia niquitosa;
     Ch@e chi non puote in fretta
     Fornir la sua vendetta,
     ... ...
     ... @e 'n tanto tormento
     Che non ha pensamento
     Di neun ben che sia,
     Ma tanto si disvia
     Che non sa migliorare
     N@e gi@a ben cominciare,
     Ma croio e nighittoso
     @E 'n ver Dio glorioso.'

	According to F. D'Ovidio, ^Flegias e Filippo Argenti~,
1919, the ^acuti~ are near the shore, Filippo's tormentors are
^difficiles~, Filippo himself represents a special type called
by
St. Thomas ^chaymus~, a misreading of Aristotle's {Greek
word}, the
man so puffed with vanity that he is always ready to take
offence.  Dante brings in the varieties of wrath as affected
by
envy, pride, and sloth.

	For Fortune, see Boethius, ^Cons. Phil.~, II, Pr. ii and
Met. ii, 1-8; IV, Pr. vi; also Albertus Magnus, ^Physicorum~
Lib.
II, Tr. ii, Cap. 14 ff.; and N. Busetto, ^Origine e natura
della
"Fortuna" dantesca~, in ^Giorn. dant.~, XII, 129; R. Murari,
^Dante e Boezio~, 1905, 271 ff.; H. R. Patch, ^The Goddess
Fortune in the Divine Commedy~, in the ^33d Annual Report of
the
Dante Society of Cambridge, Mass.~ (1914), p. 13 and ^The
Goddess Fortune in Mediaeval Literature~, 1927.  For the
wrathful, Moore, II, 173-8; Flamini, I, 161-85.  It should be
noted
that Casini puts into the fifth circle not only anger and
sloth,
but also envy and pride.  Del Lungo, however, puts here only
sloth.

{|INFERNO CANTO 08~}

	|Proemio.~ THE guardian of the fifth circle is the swift Phlegyas,
who seems to impersonate both ^furor and rancor.~  On earth he
was a king of the Lapithae, who, in a frenzy of rage against
Apollo for the violation of his daughter, set fire to the
temple
at Delphi and was slain by the god.  He is mentioned, without
specific punishment, in the ^Aeneid~, VI, 618-20:

     'Phlegyasque miserrimus omnes
     Admonet, et magni testatur voce per umbras:
     Discite justitiam moniti, et non temnere Divos.'

'Learn moderation from my example' is his warning.  In the
^Commedia~ he is a boatman on the Styx.  It can hardly be his
duty to ferry over all the spirits that are to go beyond: his
tiny skiff would not suffice; and, besides, we are given to
understand that each lost soul, after hearing its sentence,
falls
-- as it were by the weight of its own sin -- to the depth
that
befits it.  His function seems to be to carry the wrathful
spirits to their proper places in the Stygian pool.

	St. Thomas, in the ^Summa Theologiae~, Secunda
Secundae, Qu. clviii, Art. 1, distinguishes from sinful rage
the righteous indignation that is aroused by the sight of
wickedness.  This justifiable anger is illustrated, in an
exciting scene, by the attitude of Dante toward one of the
violently wrathful -- an attitude which Reason heartily
approves. 
The furious soul that so incenses Dante is Filippo Argenti
degli
Adimari of Florence, who 'in the world was a haughty person.' 
Boccaccio describes him, in the ^Decameron~, IX, 8, as 'grande
e
nerboruto e forte, sdegnoso, iracundo e bizzarro pi@u che
altro.' 

	To the shores of the swamp an air of mystery is lent by
two signal lights which are kindled we know not how, at the
top
of a tower, and another light which responds from afar.  When
at
last the poets arrive with Phlegyas at the other side, they
are
confronted by a vast wall that encircles the City of Dis, or
Lower Hell, the abiding-place of those whose sins were due,
not
to Incontinence of desire or temper, but to permanent evil
dispositions, Bestiality and Malice.  Their crimes are the
fruit
of envy and pride.  In Ps. lxxxvi, 13, we read: 'thou hast
delivered my soul from the lowest hell' -- 'eruisti animam
meam
ex inferno inferiore'; and from the word ^inferiore~ St.
Augustine and others argued a division of Hell into two parts.

	Before landing, the boat has to make a long circuit about
the fortifications.  When the gate is reached, hosts of demons
appear upon the ramparts, -- 'pi@u di mille da ciel piovuti,'
--
who successfully oppose Dante's entrance.  They lend a deaf
ear
to Virgil, and shut the doors in his face.  The discomfited
guide
and his terror-stricken follower are obliged to wait for
heavenly
aid.  The erring soul, which, seeking enlightenment, is trying
to
probe the recesses of human wickedness, comes to a stage where
further advance seems impossible.  Fear and remorse seize it
at
the aspect of the worst iniquities; reason can direct it no
longer; it is on the verge of despair.  To the horrified
searcher
it appears that reason is about to forsake him, that he is to
be
left without its guidance, while sin besets him on every hand. 
But in the hour of need divine help is not lacking.  A special
grace descends upon the distracted spirit, and opens a way
where
all seemed hopeless.  Such, apparently, is the allegory of
this
dramatic episode.

	According to a story transmitted by Boccaccio, Dante,
excluded from Florence, left behind him the first seven cantos
of
his poem, which, found subsequently by his wife, Gemma, were
sent
to him at the home of Moroello Malaspina, where he was
visiting. 
The poet then resumed his task with the word ^seguitando.~ 
Although this anecdote is generally regarded with doubt, its
authenticity is ably defended by H. Hauvette, ^$Etudes sur la
Divine Com$edie~, in ^$Etudes italiennes~, I, no. i-ii.  See
F.
D'Ovidio, ^Flegias e Filippo Argenti~, 1919; E. G. Parodi in
^Bull.~, XIX, 169-183; R. Ortiz in ^Zeitschrift f,ur
romanische
Philologie~, XLIII, 314 ff.; E. H. Wilkins, ^Io dico,
seguitando~,
in ^Annual Report of the Dante Society of Cambridge, Mass.~,
1916.

	Flamini, I, 177 ff., suggests that Filippo Argenti
represents a type of irritability due to vanity, and compares
him
with St. Thomas's ^chaymus~ (Aristotle's {Greek word}, the man
fond
of vain show.  M. Scherillo suggests that Dante's Phlegias is
not
the king of the Lapithae but a discus-thrower in the ^Thebaid~
of Statius, VI, 146: ^Il "Flegias" di Dante e il "Flegias" di
Virgilio~,
in ^Rendiconti del R. Istituto Lombardo di scienze e lettere~,
Serie II, vol. XLII (1909).

{|INFERNO CANTO 09~}

	|Proemio.~ DANTE in his terror begins to doubt whether Reason is a
safe guide.  Without venturing a direct question he tries to
ascertain whether his companion has full knowledge of the road
they are to travel.  The sage assures him that he has probed
every depth of sin -- that he has gone down to the very bottom
of
Hell.  Even so the Sibyl, in the ^Aeneid~, VI, 564-5, tells
Aeneas:

     'Sed me, cum lucis Hecate praefecit Avernis
     Ipsa Deum poenas docuit, perque omnia duxit.'

It was the Thessalian sorceress Erichtho, Virgil declares, who
sent him, shortly after his death, to fetch a soul from the
pit
of treachery.  Why she should have made him her messenger,
instead of directly conjuring up the traitor, we are not told;
perhaps Virgil's soul, being nearer the earth's surface, was
more
easily reached by her incantations.  This same Erichtho, long
before Virgil's adventure, had summoned for Sextus, the son of
Pompey, on the eve of Pharsalus, the shade of a soldier to
foretell the outcome of the battle: Lucan relates the incident
at
length in ^Pharsalia~, VI, 413 ff.  That witches had such
power
over the departed was firmly believed, not merely by the
ancients, but in Christian times down almost to our day.  Did
not
the woman of Endor, in 1 Samuel xxviii, call up Samuel to
prophesy to Saul?

	While the poets are awaiting heavenly aid, suddenly at
the top of a tower appear the threatening forms of three
Furies,
who presently summon Medusa to turn Dante to stone.  Virgil
quickly covers his disciple's eyes with his own hands. 
'Shouldst
thou see the Gorgon' he says, 'there would be no returning to
earth.'  At this point our author expressly bids us ponder the
allegory:

     'O voi ch' avete li 'ntelletti sani,
     Mirate la dottrina che s' isconde
     Sotto il velame de li versi strani.'

Many solutions have been proposed.  The most natural and
appropriate interpretation makes the Furies symbols of
remorseful
terror and Medusa the emblem of despair.  ^Desperatio~, or
despair of the mercy of God, though not so wicked as hate and
unbelief, is according to St. Thomas, incurable and therefore
more
dangerous.  In the ^Summa Theologiae~, Secunda Secundae,
Qu. xx, Art. 3, he also quotes from St. Isidore, 'To despair
is
to descend into Hell.'  St. Gregory, in his ^Moralia~, Book
VIII,
ch. xviii, 34, declares that by ^desperatio~ 'the way of
return
is cut off.'  Fear and hopelessness lead to insanity.  So, in
Ovid's ^Metamorphoses~, IV, 481 ff., Tisiphone brings madness
in
her train:

     'Nec mora, Tisiphone madefactam sanguine sumit
     Inportuna facem, fluidoque cruore rubentem
     Induitur pallam, tortoque incinguitur angue,
     Egrediturque domo.  Luctus comitatur euntem
     Et Pavor et Terror trepidoque Insania vultu.'

	Help comes in the shape of an angel, the bearer of divine
grace.  He moves through Hell like a storm-wind, scattering
the
damned before him, and opens the gate with a touch of his
wand. 
The description of his descent reminds one, in some respects,
of
a flight of Mercury told by Statius in the ^Thebaid~, II, 1-6. 
Particularly the phrase 'pigrae ire vetant nubes' resembles
Dante's:

     'Dal volto rimovea quell' aere grasso,
     Menando la sinistra innanzi spesso;
     E sol di quell' angoscia parea lasso.'

The only obstacle to God's grace is the dense atmosphere of
ignorance and spiritual blindness that it must penetrate.

{|INFERNO CANTO 10~}

	|Proemio.~ INSIDE the walls are the arch-heretics and their
followers, those who wilfully defied their Maker and renounced
his truth.  Their existence is a living death, an invocation
of
divine anger: hence their souls appear to us as buried in
tombs,
consumed by that fire which, in the ^Inferno~, seems to be a
constant symbol of God's wrath.  Those who denied a future
life
are eternally buried.  Their sin, though not a manifestation
of
Violence nor of Fraud, is due essentially to pride rather than
to
weakness; it indicates a disposition of the spirit, not an
impulse of flesh or temper: their place then, is within the
City
of Dis, but above the first great precipice that separates the
upper from the lower circles.  Heresy belongs to the
speculative
intellect.  It is not incontinence nor malice, not a sin of
the
lower appetite nor of the will.  Both St. Thomas and Dante are
apparently doubtful as to how it should be classed.  Here
Aristotle, who furnishes the general plan of Dante's Hell
offers
no help.  In this canto allegory yields to dramatic realism. 
Startling is the first call of Farinata as he stands upright
in
his tomb; not less effective Cavalcante's sudden interruption
of
the colloquy, and Farinata's prompt continuation of it, as
soon
as Cavalcante has sunk out of sight.  A curious impression of
verity is given by the little word 'credo' in line 53:

     'Credo che s' era in ginocchie levata.'

	We now learn that the damned, while aware of the past and
indistinctly cognizant of the future, have no knowledge of
present events on earth.  Just how much time the 'present'
embraces we are not told.  This idea, which seems to be
original
with our poet, opens the way to an intensely pathetic
situation
in this canto; and throughout the ^Inferno~ it provides
opportunity for varied narrative, the things of 1300 being
told
by Dante to the shades, while later events are prophesied by
them
to him.  After the Judgment Day, when earthly life shall cease
and the foresight of lost souls shall thus come to an end,
their
blindness will be unrelieved.  Ignorance of the present
(^sensibilia~) is in accord with St. Thomas and other
theologians.  Prophecy of the future (intellectual deduction
from
past facts) is, according to St. Augustine and St. Thomas,
easier
for spirits unencumbered with flesh.  St. Bonaventure tells us
that, after the Judgment, the damned shall know only what can
torment them.  See E. G. Parodi in ^Bull.~, XIX, 169.

	Although all heresies are punished in this circle, the
only one that concerns Dante is that called 'Epicurean,' a
name
bestowed, in his day, upon materialistic free-thinking which
denied the immortality of the soul and regarded a comfortable
life as the highest good.  There is grim irony in the eternal
burial of sinners who affirmed that the spirit perishes with
the
body.  Epicurus himself pagan though he was, is with them. 
According to Dante, all philosophies, ancient and modern,
admit
the existence and the after-life of the soul, which Epicurus
alone denied; he, then, was a heretic toward the truth that
prevailed in his own time.  Many of the best minds of the 13th
century were led by intellectual pride into this false belief. 
Their excellence makes their example the more terrible. 

	Among them was Cavalcante de' Calvalcanti, a noble and
wealthy Florentine, the father of that Guido whom Dante calls
his
'first friend.'  This Guido, a little older than Dante, was a
famous poet and student, an ardent partisan, hostile to the
Donati.  In June, 1300, while Dante was a prior, Guido was
banished with the other leaders of the two factions.  He was
soon
taken ill and recalled, and died in the same year.  Several
passages in the ^Vita Nuova~ point to discussions of literary
principles by the two poets; Guido, we know, advised Dante to
write his early work in Italian rather than in Latin.  He
seems
to have been an independent thinker, and probably was inclined
to
skepticism.  E. G. Parodi, however, thinks there is no proof
of
Guido's heresy, Boccaccio's story about him being fiction
(^Bull.~, XXII, 37).  When Cavalcante sees Dante traversing
Hell
in the flesh, imagining that 'altezza d' ingegno' enables the
young man to perform this miracle, he wonders why his son,
Dante's companion and likewise endowed with 'lofty genius,' is
not with him.  Dante hastens to explain Guido's absence by the
assurance that it is not his own wit, but Virgil's, which
directs
him, adding that Guido may not have duly esteemed the ancient
sage --

     'Forse cui Guido vostro ebbe a disdegno.'

This may mean that Guido's pride would not submit to the
guidance
of true Reason; or it may refer to some difference of literary
opinion -- possibly concerning the mystical significance of
the
^Aeneid~ or the fourth ^Eclogue~ -- to which we have no other
clue.  Dante's use of the past tense, 'ebbe,' suggests to the
father that his son is dead, that he is past repentance and
salvation; and this supposition being confirmed by the
bewildered
silence of the poet (who does not yet know that lost souls are
ignorant of the present), he falls back in despair.

	Another famous heretic is Manente degli Uberti, called
Farinata, chief of the Florentine Ghibellines, a wise and
valiant
leader, who died in 1264, a year before Dante's birth.  In
1260
he had taken part in the battle of Montilperti, where the
Guelfs
of Florence suffered a fearful defeat from the Sienese, the
exiled Ghibellines, and King Manfred's Germans.  Some 10000 of
the Florentines were killed, 5000 wounded, and 15000 taken as
prisoners to Siena; the battlefield, we are told, was all red
with blood, as if it had been covered with scarlet cloth. 
After
this rout, the neighboring towns and barons held a council at
Empoli, and all but Farinata were in favor of destroying
Florence; he, however, opposed the project so stoutly that it
was
abandoned.  In 1283 the inquisitor, Salmone da Lucca,
condemned
him (nearly twenty years dead), his wife his sons, and his
grandsons, as heretics; his bones were cast out his property
confiscated and sold.  His brave and haughty spirit is not
quelled even by his fiery punishment: he appears with head and
chest erect, 'as if he held Hell in great contempt.'  Dante
approaches him with deference; only when goaded beyond
endurance
by Farinata's taunts does he show resentment.  To him, as to
Cavalcante, he uses the respectful ^voi~, a form of address
that
he applies to no other of the damned, save Brunetto Latini.

	See F. De Sanctis, ^Il Farinata di Dante~, 1869; G.
Surra, ^La conoscenza del futuro e del passato nei dannati
danteschi~, 1911; Parodi, pp. 535 ff. (Farinata, a magnanimous
patriot, aroused conflicting emotions in Dante; in Hell,
Farinata
foresees that Dante shall be in exile, in company with some of
Farinata's own people); M. Barbi, ^Il Canto di Farinata~, in
^Studi danteschi~, VIII, 87; A. de Salvio, ^Dante and Medieval
Heresy~, in ^Romanic Review~, XI, 289.  For the Epicureans,
see
^Giorn. dant.~, VIII 170.  See also ^Conv.~, II, ix, 55-74;
IV,
vi, 97-114.  On the rough edge of the circular precipice
leading
to the seventh circle we meet the most shocking example of
unbelief, an heretical Pope -- the more gruesome because he
does
not appear, his presence being indicated only by an
inscription
on his tomb.  This is Anastasius II, who for many centuries
was
generally but unjustly thought to have been induced by
Photinus,
deacon of Thessalonica, to deny the divinity of Christ; it is
likely that he had been confused with the Byzantine emperor,
Anastasius I.

{|INFERNO CANTO 11~}

	|Proemio.~ AT this point the master explains to his follower the
general plan of the lower world.  In Purgatory, too, the
exposition occurs in the middle of the journey.  The
arrangement
of punishments has been described in the preliminary note to
the
^Inferno.~  In Virgil's account, based on the teaching of
ancient
philosophers, there is no mention of the sluggards, the
unbaptized, or the heretics.  Cicero wrote in his ^De
Officiis~,
I, 13:  'Cum autem duobus modis, id est aut vi aut fraude,
fiat
injuria, fraus quasi vulpeculae, vis leonis videtur, utrumque
homine alienissimum, sed fraus odio digna majore.  Totius
autem
injustitiae nulla capitlior est quam eorum qui, cum maxime
fallunt, id agunt ut viri boni esse videantur.'  Aristotle
makes
the same distinction.  These two kinds of sin, ^vis~, or
violence, and ^fraus~, fraud, are chastised in the Lower Hell. 
Outside the City of Dis, in the second, third, fourth, and
fifth
circles, are those who erred through Incontinence.  In
AristotIe's ^Ethics~, VII, i, are specified three sorts of
conduct to be shunned, {three Greek words}; the Latin
translation used by St. Thomas calls them (Flamini, I, p. 146)
'malitia, incontinentia, et bestialitas,' and we are told
further
(Flamini, I, p. 151), 'minus autem bestialis malitia,
terribilius
autem.'  'Major infamia, minor culpa,' says Gregory.  St.
Thomas
often uses the term ^bestialitas~, as well as ^bestialis
incontinentia~ and ^bestialis malitia.~  Incontinence is
treated
in the ^Ethics~, VII, iii-x.  Although Bestiality, as
Aristotle
defines it (VII v), is something more inhuman than common
violence, it seems probable that Dante roughly equated it with
Cicero's ^vis~; while malice corresponds well enough to the
Ciceronian ^fraus.~  At any rate, Incontinence, Violence, and
Fraud are the three great groups under which evil acts are
classified.

	Expounding the sins of the Lower Hell, Virgil declares
that every wrongdoing hateful to God has harm for its object,
and
this harm is inflicted either by force or by deceit.  Of these
two methods the latter is the worse.  The former is punished
in
the seventh circle.  But inasmuch as force may be done to our
fellow-man, to ourselves, or to our Maker, this circle is
divided
into three concentric rings: the first contains assassins,
robbers, and tyrants; the second, suicides; the third,
blasphemers, sodomites, and usurers.  Sodomites do violence to
Nature, the minister of God.  Usurers -- that is,
money-lenders
-- do violence to human industry, the offspring of Nature, and
thus offend the Creator.  This view of the practice of letting
money at interest was usual in the Middle Ages. 'Thou shalt
not
lend upon usury to thy brother,' says Deut. xxiii, 19.  At the
beginning of the ^Ethics~, IV, i, Aristotle declares that 'the
waste of property seems to be a sort of self-ruin, since life
is
maintained by property.'  In accordance with this idea, Dante
puts with the suicides, in the second ring, those who wasted
their goods so recklessly that their death resulted; they are
distinguished, in the ^Inferno~, from the ordinary prodigals,
whose fault was one of Incontinence.

	Fraud may be perpetrated upon those who have no special
cause to trust us, in which case only the common tie of
humanity
is broken; or upon those who have a particular ground for
confidence, and then outrage is done not only to this
universal
fellowship, but also to the bond of family, country,
hospitality,
or gratitude.  Deceivers of the former sort are tormented,
according to the nature of their fraud, in the ten circular,
concentric ditches of the eighth circle: eight of the ten
types
are rapidy enumerated in this canto; the other two -- evil
counsellors and sowers of discord -- are dismissed with the
epithet 'similar filth.'  Traitors to kindred, fatherland,
guests, or benefactors find their eternal abode in the icy
plain
of the ninth circle.  See Moore, II, 152 ff.; D'Ovidio, 241
ff.; Flamini, I,
143-58.

	Dante inverts St. Thomas's order of ^vis~ and ^fraus.~ 
Aristotle expresses no opinion as to their comparative
wickedness.  On this point Dante runs counter to most of his
authorities, combining ^vis~ with ^bestialis malitia.~  He
goes
beyond St. Thomas in making bestiality a third distinct state
of
the will, opposing bestial sin to justice, while St. Thomas
opposes it to temperance.  In fact, Dante's 'bestiality'
corresponds to St. Thomas's ^bestialis malitia~ rather than to
his ^bestialis incontinentia.~  Into his 7th circle he puts
the
only kinds of bestiality seriously discussed by St. Thomas:
ferocity (tyranny) and sodomy.  Bestiality is worse than sins
of
^infirmitas~, less bad than sins of ^malitia humana.~  Fraud
is
'de l'uom proprio male,' therefore ^malitia humana.~

	P. H. Wicksteed, in ^Modern Language Review~, XVI, 265,
points out a certain similarity of classification in all three
^cantiche.~  In each, there are three groups which subdivide
into
seven classes, to which are added two more classes of a
somewhat
different type and one more type still more different.  E.g.,
in
^Inferno~ are the seven Aristotelian sins of unbelief and
misbelief in the ^Antinferno.~

{|INFERNO CANTO 12~}

	|Proemio.~ THROUGHOUT this episode, either by accident or by design,
Dante does not speak.  The canto deals with the descent into
the
seventh circle -- the abode of the violent -- and the
description of
the first of the three concentric rings that compose it.  This
first
^girone~ consists of a river of hot blood, a picture of
sanguinary relations to one's fellowmen.  The ^Visio Alberici~
also tells of homicides in a lake of boiling blood; and the
^Visio Sancti Pauli~ shows different kinds of sinners immersed
to
varying depths in a fiery stream.  In the ^Inferno~, too, the
degree of immersion varies between eyebrows and feet,
according
to the wickedness of the offence.

	Along the narrow bank run centaurs, whose business it is
to keep the other souls in their proper place.  These
half-human
guardians are not depicted as hateful or repulsive: they do
not
seem to be demons, although their function is similar to that
of
the devils beside the ditch of barrators in the eighth circle;
they appear to be rather the spirits of real centaurs,
creatures
whose semi-equine character made their excesses more natural
and
consequently less blameworthy.  They may be intended also to
serve as illustrations of Aristotle's doctrine of bestiality.

	A still stronger suggestion of bestiality is conveyed by
the presing genius of the whole seventh circle, the Minotaur,
half man and half bull, whose blind fury ('quell' ira
^bestial~')
defeats its own end and affords the travelers a chance to
pass him.  The monster -- '^bestia,~' Virgil calls him -- was
the offspring of a bull and Pasiphae, wife of King Minos
of Crete, who satisfied her abnormal passion (inflicted by
Venus
as a curse) by enclosing herself in a wooden cow --

     'colei
     Che s' ^imbesti@o~ ne le ^'mbestiate~ schegge,'

as Dante says in ^Purg.~ XXVI, 86-7.

	The Athenian hero Theseus slew the Minotaur in the
Labyrinth, guided by Ariadne, the daughter of Pasiphae and
Minos.
Dante to avoid placing this monster in any one of the three
^gironi~, puts him on the cliff that overlooks them all.  In
the
same way Geryon the image of Fraud, is represented as hovering
over the eighth circle.

	The poets' way down the precipice lies in a huge
landslide made by the earthquake which, when Christ died and
descended into Hell shook also a part of the wall between the
unbaptized and the lustful (V, 34), and likewise damaged the
hypocrites' valley in the eighth circle.  In each case Dante
uses
the word ^ruina.~  This vast slide our poet compares with one
in
northeastern ItaIy, the Slavini di Marco, described by
Albertus
Magnus.

	For the passage from Albertus Magnus, see Torraca.  For
the centaurs, see E. Ciafardini, ^Due saggi danteschi~, 1925.

{|INFERNO CANTO 13~}

	|Proemio.~ THE Church Fathers, from St. Augustine down, put suicide
on a par with murder.  Each is an attempt to cut short the
term
of life allotted by God, a crime of insubordination against
the
Creator.  Neither can be justified by any excuse save the
direct
command of Heaven: thus Abraham was divinely bidden to
sacrifice
Isaac, and Samson destroyed himself in accordance with the
Lord's
will.  It is perhaps worth noting that Dante mentions no pagan
in
this place; but as he cites only two examples, a Capuan and an
unnamed Florentine, the significance of the omission is small
--
or would be so, had he not assigned several heathen suicides
(Lucretia, Dido, Cato, Seneca) to different parts of the other
world.

	The Capuan is Pier delle Vigne, who, after studying, in
all probability, at Bologna, entered the court of Frederick II
as
a notary, and so won the confidence and affection of his
sovereign that for over twenty years he was entrusted with the
most important affairs of the realm.  He was one of the
foremost
poets of the Sicilian school; many of his verses, as well as
some
of his Latin letters, are preserved.  In 1248 or 1249 he was
accused and convicted of treason; his eyes were put out, and
according to one account he was condemned by the Emperor to be
led in derision, on an ass, from town to town.  To escape
dishonor, he killed himself by dashing his head against a
wall. 
It was no doubt with a view of emphasizing the inexorableness
of
God's canon that Dante selected the most sympathetic case he
could find, one in which cruel injustice might seem to condone
the offence.  Piero, as Dante conceived him, is loyal,
magnanimous, courtly, and most pathetic in his unshaken
devotion
to the master who wronged him.

	The style of this canto abounds in curious conceits, such
as the

     " Cred' io ch' ei credette ch' io credesse '

of l. 25, the 'infiammati infiammar' of l. 68, the double
antithesis of l. 69, and the involved paradoxes of the
following
tiercet.  It would seem that meditation over Pier delle Vigne
who
dominates the canto, had filled our poet with the spirit of
the
older school, so that, either purposely or unconsciously, he
imitated its artistic processes.  Pier delle Vigne's
epistolary
style is highly artificial and flowery.

	The suicide uses his freedom of bodily movement only to
deprive himself of it, robbing himself, by his own act, of
that
which corporeally distinguishes him from a plant.  Such a
sinner,
then, his wicked deed eternalized, may aptly be figured as a
tree
or bush.  Dante's self-slaughterers form a thick, wild forest
in
the second ring of the seventh circle.  There, upon hearing
their
sentence from Minos, they fall at random, in no predestined
spot:
they have put themselves outside of God's law, rebelling
against
his eternal plan.  On the Day of Judgment they will return,
with
the rest, for their earthly remains; but, instead of putting
on
the flesh again, they will drag their corpses through Hell and
hang them on their boughs, where the poor bodies will dangle
forever, a torment to the souls that slew them.  The pent-up
agony of these spirits finds no means of expression until they
are broken in leaf or branch; then the voice issues forth,
with
tears of blood.

	The like had been seen and heard by Aeneas in a
Thracian grove, when, to deck an altar, he unwittingly plucked
shrubs from the grave of Polydorus: blood trickled from the
severed roots, and a voice came forth -- not from the tree, as
in
Dante, but from the mound (^Aen.~, III, 39 ff.): --

     'Gemitus lacrimabilis imo
     Auditur tumulo, et vox reddita fertur ad aures:
     Quid miserum, Aenea, laceras? Jam parce sepulto,
     Parce pias scelerare manus.  Non me tibi Troja
     Externum tulit.  Haud cruor hic de stipite manat.'

	In the suicides' wood, an outlet for the mournful voice
is afforded by harpies, voracious, filthy birds with maidens'
faces, which rend the foliage.  They may well represent
misgiving
or fear of the hereafter -- 'tristo annunzio di futuro danno.' 
Virgil describes them in the ^Aeneid~, III, 216-8: --

     'Virginei volucrum vultus, foedissima ventris
     Proluvies, uncaeque manus, et pallida semper
     Ora fame.'

Their appearance in the same book of the ^Aeneid~ with
Polydorus may have led Dante to associate them with his
speaking
trees.  On the Strophades islands, off Messenia, where they
dwelt, their foul presence repeatedly interrupted the Trojans'
repast; and finally one of them, Celaeno, perched on a high
rock, uttered so threatening a prophecy that the warriors
hastily
departed.

     'Dixit, et in silvam pinnis ablata refugit.'

Thus in Virgil, as in Dante, the harpy is connected with a
wood.

	With the suicides are the reckless squanderers, those who
rush madly through life pursued by the black hounds of Ruin
and
Death.  Their sudden irruption is the more effective for its
brevity and unexpectedness.  The episode reminds one of
legends
of the Wild Hunt, and of the ghostly chase described by
Boccaccio
in his ^Decameron~, V, 8.  It resembles also the story of
Actaeon, torn to pieces by his own dogs, in Ovid's
^Metamorphoses~, III, 138 ff.; this tale, furthermore, had
been
rationistically explained by Fulgentius as meaning that the
luckless hunter spent all his substance upon dogs.

	See Aen., III: for Polydorus, 22-43; for the harpies,
209-69; for Celaeno, 245 ff.  Cf. D'Ovidio, 179-82.  For
the collocation of the squanderers with the suicides, see the
argument to X.  For the Wild Hunt, R. Serra in ^Giorn. stor.~,
XLIII, 278; cf. Bull., XI, 234.  For Actaeon, D'Ovidio,
196-9.  For Pier delle Vigne, see Novati, 67 ff.; D'Ovidio,
143
ff.; F. De Sanctis in his ^Saggi critici~, 1874.  For the
Latin
style of Pier delle Vigne, see F. Novati, ^Con Dante e per
Dante~, 17-8, 31.  For the bleeding plant, see J. W. Wolf,
^Beitr,age zur deutschen mythologie~, p. 291.  In the ^Bonum
Universale de Apibus~ of Thomas Cantiprotensis, there is a
story
of a boy who, having tried to cut a stick from a branch, is
frightened to see it bleed.

{|INFERNO CANTO 14~}

	|Proemio.~ THE third and innermost ring of the seventh circle
consists of a sandy plain upon which falls a rain of fire.  It
stands for the experience of those who directly and wittingly
defy God and live in his wrath, of which fire is the symbol.
'Then the Lord rained upon Sodom and upon Gomorrah brimstone
and fire from the Lord out of heaven,' says Gen. xix, 24.  And
in
Ezekiel xxxviii, 22, we read: 'I will rain upon him, and upon
his
bands, and upon the many people that are with him, an
overflowing
rain, and great hailstones, fire, and brimstone.'  The
blasphemers, who did violence to God himself, lie prostrate;
the
sodomites, sinners against God's minister, Nature, run
incessantly; the usurers, outragers of human industry, the
child
of Nature, sit crouching.  Of these classes, the second is
largest.

	Rather curiously, the first class is represented by a
pagan, the tall Capaneus, who, 'scornful and twisted,'
maintains
his arrogant pose and 'seems not to be ripened by the rain.' 
His
futile pride is more shocking to Reason than any offence yet
encountered; his own rage is his worst punishment.  St. Thomas
says, in his commentary on Aristotle (quoted in Flamini, I,
143):
'Est aliquis qui non est vere audax, sed videtur: scilicet
superbus, quoniam fingit se esse fortem; unde, sicut fortis
vel
audax se habet circa terribilia, ita superbus quaerit
apparere.'  The story of Capaneus is told by Statius in the
^Thebaid~, X, 870-939: he was one of the seven kings who
attacked
Thebes; scaling the walls, whence his gigantic shadow
frightened
the city, he mocked at the gods and challenged Jove, who
thereupon slew him with a thunderbolt.

     'Ille jacet lacerae complexus fragmina turris,
     Torvus adhuc visu.' -- ^Thebaid~, XI, 9-10.

So he lies in Hell, taunting Jove with his labors at the
battle
against the giants.  Statius, too, recalls this conflict,
saying
that at the downfall of Capaneus the other gods rejoiced with
Jupiter, 'as if he were wearily toiling in the fight at
Phlegra.'

	Traversing the plain, from the wood to the great
precipice, is a raised channel built like a dike, through
which
runs a torrent of boiling blood.  This brook issues from the
river of the first ring and falls over the cliff into the
circle
below.  All the rivers of Hell in fact, are connected, forming
a
single stream, which assumes different shapes in the various
circles.  Its source is now described.  In the island of
Crete,
midway between the old world and the new is the figure of an
aged
man, fashioned like the 'great image' in the dream of
Nebuchadnezzar in Daniel ii, 32-3: 'This image's head was of
fine
gold, his breast and his arms of silver, his belly and his
thighs
of brass, his legs of iron, his feet part of iron and part of
clay.'  Daniel interprets the image as a prophecy of four
kingdoms.  But Dante's statue evidently represents humanity in
its successive ages as they are depicted, for instance, in
Ovid's
^Metamorphoses~, I, 89 ff.  The clay foot signifies the weak
and
unstable condition of man.  Ever since the Golden Age (the
state
of Adam and Eve before the fall) mankind has been imperfect;
therefore all the statue except the head is split by a crack,
St.
Thomas's 'vulneratio naturae.'  From this fissure flow the
tears
of the sinful generations of men; descending into Hell, they
make
the infernal streams.  The torments of the human soul, in
whatsoever form they appear, really consist in sorrow over its
own imperfections.  It should be remembered that Crete is a
half-way station between the Old World and the New. Aeneas
stopped there, on his way from Troy to Latium; St. Paul, lost
in
a storm, stopped there, going from Jerusalem to Rome.  But
Aeneas, representing Empire, and St. Paul representing the
Cross, did not come together.  Therefore Humanity is still
imperfect, the conjunction of Eagle and Cross being needed for
its redemption.  The Old Man looks forward to their union in
Rome.

	The bed of the connecting brook is all of stone, bottom
and sides; and so are the high, flat, narrow banks on either
hand.  On one of these -- the nearer, right-hand one -- the
poets
mount to pursue their way across the desert; for no fire falls
upon the duct.  With great solemnity Virgil directs his
disciple's attention to the stream, 'which deadens all the
flamelets above it.'  Nothing so noteworthy has been seen, he
declares, since they entered the open gate of Hades.  The
unclosed door seems to figure our predisposition to sin.  Does
the quenching of the fire by boiling blood signify the
appeasing
of God's anger by human suffering?  A symbol of atonement is
manifestly out of place in the literal Hell; but allegorically
Dante's lower world stands for the sinful life of man. 
Christian
tradition had come to derive the four rivers of Paradise from
the
tears of Christ, and one branch of the story traced to the
same
source even the rivers of the lower world.

	For Capaneus, see E. Ciafardini, ^Due Saggi danteschi~,
1925.  For the ^vulneratio naturae~ see St. Thomas, ^Summa
Theologiae~, Prima Secundae, Qu. lxxxv, Art. 3; cf. Flamini,
II, 31.  See G. Busnelli, ^Il Virgilio dantesco e il gran
Veglio di Creta~, 1919.  See also L. Valli, ^Il Segreto della
Croce e dell'Aquila nella Divina Commedia~, 1922, especially
p.
119.  For the rivers and the statues, see H. J. Silverstein,
^The
Weeping Statue and Dante's Gran Veglio~, in ^Harvard Studies
and Notes in Philology and Literature~, XIII, 165, especially
182-183.

{|INFERNO CANTO 15~}

	|Proemio.~ BRUNETTO LATINI, who fills this canto, was one of the
leading figures in the Florence of the generation just before
Dante.  Born about 1220, of an illustrious family, he
distinguished himself for ability, culture, and vast
erudition.
His profession of notary gave him the title of ^Ser.~  In 1260
he
was sent as ambassador to the court of Alfonso X of Castile. 
On
his way back he learned of the overthrow of the Guelf party,
to
which he belonged, at Montaperti and deemed it best to stay in
France.  There he wrote in French his great encyclopaedia, ^Li
livres dou Tr$esor~; he composed also in Italian verse a
shorter
didactic work, allegorical in form, known as the ^Tesoretto.~ 
In
1266, after the overthrow of the Ghibellines at Benevento, he
returned to Florence, where he filled various public offices,
and
was held in great honor until his death in 1294.  Dante
addresses
him with respectful ^voi.~

	Two motives, in all probability, induced our author to
give Brunetto so conspicuous a place in his poem.  The first
was
gratitude.  To the ^Tesoretto~ Dante owed perhaps his first
conception of a grand didactic poem clad in allegory.  But
there
must have been, besides, a warm personal attachment between
the
gifted youth and the great scholar and statesman who, by his
counsel, taught the lad 'how man can make himself eternal.' 
In
the ^Tr$esor~, indeed, Dante may have read (in the Italian
version quoted by Torraca): 'E quelli, che delle grandi cose
trattano, testimoniano che gloria d@a al l'uomo valente una
seconda vita, ci@o @e a dire, che dopo la morte sua, la
nominanza
che rimane delle sue buone opere, fa parere che egli sia
tuttora
in vita' -- an idea which reappears more than once in the
^Commedia.~  Of their friendship we have no knowledge save the
touching picture suggested by this canto.  It is by no means
impossible that Brunetto lectured in Florence, and that Dante
was
among his hearers.  Some have supposed that Latini had cast
Dante's horoscope: this is unlikely, as both the ^Tr$esor~ and
the ^Tesoretto~ ascribe little influence to the stars.  The
word
'stella,' as he uses it in l. 55, signifies no more than
destiny
or natural disposition.

	Another reason for giving prominence to Latini was that
which we noted in the case of Pier delle Vigne -- the desire
to
furnish an extreme example.  In Brunetto we have a man endowed
with fine intellectual and most endearing moral qualities, yet
tainted with one vice which destroys his soul.  It is only
through Dante that we know of his sin, but there can be no
doubt
of its reality; in his day assuredly many were aware of it. 
Thus
the doctrine is again enforced that a single deadly fault,
unexpiated, will damn a man otherwise noble.  The contrast
between his general dignity and his fatal weakness is
emphasized
at the end of the canto, when the elderly sage is suddenly
forced
to put aside his gravity and run like a racer to rejoin his
fellows.

	Few episodes are more startling than the first encounter
of Dante and his old master in Hell; few are more pathetic
than
their walk together, the younger poet on the dike, the older
on
the plain below, beside his companion's skirt, his shoulders
reaching perhaps to the level of Dante's feet.  No nearer
approach is lawful.  The dusky setting is described (in ll.
18-21)
with a couple of swift similes, which it is interesting to
compare with the more leisurely style of Virgil in the
^Aeneid~, VI, 268-72 and 450-4:

     'Ibant obscuri sola sub nocte per umbram,
     Perque domos Ditis vacuas et inania regna;
     Quale per incertam lunam sub luce maligna
     Est iter in silvis, ubi caelum condidit umbra
     Jupiter, et rebus nox abstulit atra colorem.'
     'Inter quas Phoenissa recens a vulnere Dido
     Errabat silva in magna, quam Troius heros
     Ut primum juxta stetit, agnovitque per umbram
     Obscuram, qualem primo qui surgere mense
     Aut videt aut vidisse putat per nubila lunam.'

	See Novati, 334 ff.  See also E. G. Parodi, 255 ff.:
Latini is introduced here not only for the sake of impartial
justice and as an awful example, but also to affirm Dante's
title
to leadership, which is here proclaimed by Brunetto in Canto
XV
of the ^Inferno~ as it is affirmed by Cacciaguida in Canto XV
of
the ^Paradiso.~

{|INFERNO CANTO 16~}

	|Proemio.~ AT the close of this canto poetic ingenuity does its
utmost to intensify the effect of mystery and suspense. 
Virgil's
reading of his companion's unspoken thought, the eager
expectancy
of both travelers, the strange and unexplained casting of a
girdle into the abyss, Dante's reluctance to impart to us an
event too marvelous for our belief -- all this leads up to the
final shadow of a weird form looming into sight, with which
the
narrative stops.

	Arriving at the edge of the cliff, the boundary of the
seventh circle, Dante, who hitherto has worn 'una corda
intorno
cinta,' takes off this girdle and hands it, 'knotted and
coiled,'
to his guide.  Virgil throws it out into the darkness -- a
signal
(so we afterwards learn) for the huge flying monster Geryon,
the
embodiment of Fraud and keeper of the eighth circle, who is to
carry them down on his back.  With this cord, we are told,
Dante
had once thought 'to catch the leopard with the painted hide,'
which in the first canto represented the habit of Fraud. 
Henceforth Dante goes ungirded until he is about to begin the
ascent of the mountain of Purgatory; then, at the bidding of
Cato, he is girt with a rush, the emblem of humility.  It
should
be remembered that in the Bible a girdle symbolizes strength.

	The significance of the cord has been variously
interpreted, and there is now no agreement among commentators. 
This rope must stand for something upon which Dante at one
time
built false hopes, but now, at the command of Reason,
discards;
something, moreover, to be appropriately replaced by humility;
and, lastly, something which shall attract Geryon and bring
him
to view.  This something may well be self-confidence, the
opposite of humility; a seeming strength, which the poet
formerly
deemed adequate for the mastery of his faults; a delusion, and
therefore a lure to the genius of Deceit.  The coiled and
knotted
rope itself suggests a snare; in ^Par.~ XXVIII, 12, indeed,
Dante
uses the word ^corda~ in this sense -- 'a pigliarmi fece Amor
la
corda.'  Geryon, when he appears, has his breast and sides
decorated with 'knots and rings' corresponding to the shape of
the cast-off belt.  While girt with self-confidence, Dante
contended vainly against Fraud; but no sooner is this
deceptive
girdle put aside than Fraud becomes amenable to Reason.

	Many commentators, from early times to Del Lungo, have
maintained that Dante at one time intended to become a friar,
and
that the rope is the Franciscan girde.  In connection with
this
view we may consider Dante's long discussion of vows in ^Par.~
IV
and V.

	See U. Cosmo in ^Giorn. dant.~, IX, 47; P. Chistoni in
^Bull.~, X, 325; N. Zingarelii in ^Rassegna critica della
Letteratura italiana~, XVII, 72.  P. Mandonnet, ^Theologus
Dantes~, in ^Comit$e fran$cais Catholique pour la
c$el$ebration
du sixi@eme centenaire de la mort de Dante Alighieri, Bulletin
du Jubil$e~, No. 5, assures us that Dante, between fifteen and
twentyfive, had been tonsured and had taken the lesser orders,
the ^Vita Nuova~ being an allegory of that experience. 
Dante's
three great works, Mandonnet tells us further, are dedicated
respectively to poetry, to philosophy, and to theology.  In
the
description of the usurers, squatting on the edge of the
chasm,
now brushing off the flakes of fire, now lifting themselves on
their hands from the hot sand, we are shown guilty souls in a
state of abominable degradation.  Their faces have lost all
human
likeness; they can be recognized only by their money-bags,
decked
out with their coats of arms.  To such a pass man can be
brought
by inordinate love of gold, which consumes his humanity and
his
very individuality.  Doglike, bovine, disgusting as these
creatures are, they came of noble stock.  No poor Jews, but
illustrious Italian Christians, are selected by the poet to
point
his moral.

{|INFERNO CANTO 17~}

	|Proemio.~ THE descent into the darkness, on Geryon's back, is
suggestively pictured in quick, realistic touches.  At first
nothing but the monster himself is visible, and Dante's only
consciousness of motion comes from the upward rush of the air. 
Gradually, at various points below, the fires of the eighth
circle begin to glimmer, and lamentations reach his ear; but
all
is dim and mysterious.

	In classical mythology Geryon, son of Chrysaor and
Callirrho,e, was a three-headed giant king in Spain, who was
killed by Hercules.

     'Tergemini nece Geryonis spoliisque superbus
     Alcides aderat.' -- ^Aen.~, VIII, 202-3.

A passing reference to his shade, as a 'forma tricorporis
umbrae,' is made in ^Aen.~, VI, 289.  To the mediaeval
scholar this triple nature apparently symbolized deceit.
Boccaccio says, in his ^Genealogia Deorum Gentilium~, I, 21,
speaking of Dante's Fraud: 'Et inde Gerion dicta est, quia
regnans apud Baleares insulas Gerion miti vultu blandisque
verbis
et omni comitate consueverit hospites suscipere et demum sub
hac
benignitate sopitos occidere.'  He discusses the classic
Geryon
in XIII, i.

	The monstrous form ascribed to him by Dante was doubtless
suggested in part by the locusts of Rev. ix, 7-11: 'And the
shapes of the locusts were like unto horses prepared unto
battle...
and their faces were as the faces of men....  And they had
tails like unto scorpions and there were stings in their
tails....  And they had a king over them, which is the angel
of the
bottomless pit....'  St. Thomas, in his commentary on this
passage, tells us that the scorpion has a smooth and gentle
countenance, to induce people to touch it.  The belief that
scorpions have attractive faces seems to have been prevalent.
Dante's image was profoundy modified, however, by Pliny's
description -- followed by Solinus -- of a strange beast
called
Mantichora (^Historia Naturalis~, VIII, 30) which has the face
of
a man, the body of a lion, and a tail ending in a sting like a
scorpion's.  Similar creatures are portrayed by Albertus
Magnus
(^De Animalibus~, Lib. XXII, Tr. ii, Cap. i) and Brunetto
Latini
(^Tr$esor~, V, Ch. 59); all of these eat human flesh, and of
one
of them it is said that 'deceptos homines devorat.'  In the
Old
French ^Image du monde~, of the first half of the 13th
century,
'Manticare' attracts men by song and devours them.  On the
appropriateness of an upright human face combined with a
scorpion's sting, as an emblem of fraud, there is no need to
dwell.

	See F. Cipolla, ^Il Gerione di Dante~, 1895; B. Soldati
in ^Giorn. stor.~, XLI, 84; R. T. Holbrook, ^Dante and the
Animal
kingdom~, 64.  There are dragons with human faces on the 11th
century fa$cade of the Duomo in Assisi.

{|INFERNO CANTO 18~}

	|Proemio.~ TO form an idea of the general structure of the eighth
and ninth circles, one may think of a funnel with a shallow
mouth
and a thick spout.  The upper part will represent the eighth
circle, sloping down to the edge of a central hole ('un pozzo
assai largo e profondo') at the bottom of which is the ninth
circle.  Now let one imagine this upper part, the mouth of the
funnel, horizontally corrugated so that ten deep grooves run
around it, one below the other.  These are the ditches
(^bolge~
or ^valli~) in which the various types of Fraud are punished. 
Furthermore, let one picture a number of strips running down
the
inside of the funnel from the outer edge to the beginning of
the
neck-like spokes converging upon a hub; and these strips
should
be conceived, not as flat, but as undulating, arching up over
the
grooves.  The strips will correspond to certain sharp ridges
of
natural rock that traverse the circle, at intevals, from top
to
bottom, rising into high, steep bridges over the valleys, and
resting on the intervening banks.  These ^scogli~, as they are
called, form a set of embankments on which wayfarers -- if
such
there be -- may cross the circle without descending into the
ditches.  Dante gives to this circle the fantastic name of
^Malebolge~, or 'Evil Pouches.'  He compares the ^bolge~ and
the
^scogli~ to a series of moats, with drawbridges, surrounding a
castle in concentric rings.

	In describing the double march of the lost souls in the
first ^bolgia~, Dante recalls a scene witnessed by many
thousands
in Rome in the Jubilee year of 1299-1300.  The following
account
is borrowed from C. E. Norton's translation of the ^Hell~, pp.
112-3: 'The jubilee was instituted by Boniface VIII, who
issued a
Bull granting plenary indulgence for a year from Christmas,
1299,
to all pilgrims to Rome who should spend fifteen days in the
city, visit the churches of St. Peter and St. Paul, and should
confess and repent their sins.  The throng of pilgrims from
all
parts of Europe was enormous, and among other precautions for
their safety was that here alluded to, a barrier erected
lengthwise along the bridge of Sant' Angelo, in order that the
crowd going to and coming from St. Peter's might pass in
opposite
directions without interference.'

	The fraudulent are divided into ten categories, and some
of these are subdivided.  In the first ^bolgia~ are betrayers
of
women, who fall into two classes, panders (^ruffiani~) and
seducers.  They walk ceaselessly around the bottom of their
ditch, in two files, moving in opposite directions (like the
pilgrims on the bridge), the panders on the outer, the
seducers
on the inner side.  Horned devils scourge them with whips as
they
pass.  Thus are sinners of this sort constantly goaded on by
their mean passions.  In Malebolge demons abound -- not mere
guardians, similar to those of the classic underworld but
malignant, tormenting fiends.  There are no such spirits,
however, in the second valley, where the punishment is simply
nauseous filth and stench, a symbol of the unclean life of
flatterers.  To portray their abject vileness, the author
deems
no terms too gross.

{|INFERNO CANTO 19~}

	|Proemio.~ THE sin punished in the third ^bolgia~ is simony, the use
of ecclesiastical office for private gain.  Dante classifies
it
as Fraud but it was generally regarded as an offence against
the
Holy Ghost.  It derives its name from the Simon Magus of Acts
viii, 9-24: 'But there was a certain man, called Simon, which
beforetime in the same city used sorcery....And when Simon saw
that through laying on of the apostles' hands the Holy Ghost
was
given, he offered them money, saying, Give me also this
power....But Peter said unto him, Thy money perish with thee,
because thou hast thought that the gift of God may be
purchased
with money.'  Inasmuch as this offence is one of perversion,
it
is symbolized by the culprit being turned upside down; and as
the
perverted trust is a holy one God's anger falls upon the
incumbent in the shape of fire, which, owing to his distorted
attitude, burns not his head but his feet.  The bottom and
sides
of this ditch are perforated with little round holes, from
each
of which project the writhing feet and ankles of a sinner.
Somewhat similarly, in the ^Visio Alberici~, XI, simonists are
confined in a fiery well.  Dante's flame, however, merely
plays
upon the surface of the soles, from which it seems to suck its
food.  This grotesque penalty is inflicted even upon mercenary
Popes, all of whom appear to be sunk in one hole.  The latest
comer is at the top, 'planted like a stake,' with his feet in
the
air; the others, with each new arrival, are pushed further and
further down, to flatten in the crevices of the rock.  Dante
and
Virgil descend into this ^bolgia~ to converse with Pope
Nicholas
III.  To him our traveler addresses, with the approval of
Reason,
though with some misgiving, a stinging rebuke, made all the
more
impressive by Dante's professed reluctance to show disrespect
to
a former wearer of the papal mantle.

	The burrows of the simonists are compared to the pits for
baptizers in the Baptistery of Florence, which Dante lovingly
calls 'his beautiful San Giovanni.'  Here all the new-born
children of the city were baptized by immersion either on the
Saturday before Easter or on June 24th, the day of St. John
the
Baptist.  It would seem that to protect the priests from the
throng they were stationed in four cylindrical holes in the
waist-high marble wall that surrounded the large circular font
in
the middle of the church Dante takes this occasion to declare
that he once broke down one of these receptacles to save some
one
drowning inside and adds:

     'E questo sia suggel ch' ogni uomo sganni,'

'And let this be a seal -- i.e., a document an authoritative
final statement -- that shall undeceive every one.' 
Apparently
he introduces the subject in order to put a stop to false
rumors
concerning his act.  We really know nothing about the curious
incident, although Benvenuto da Imola, one of the early
commentators relates a circumstantial story of boys playing on
the wall and one of them falling into one of the holes, from
which he could not be extricated until rescued by Dante.  Many
such tales were quickly invented to explain obscure references
in
the poem.  It may be surmised that the ^dentro~ refers, not to
the baptizer's hole, but to the tank itself, from which the
water
had to be drawn to save a drowning baby that had slipped in.

	For a comprehensive discussion of this canto, see
D'Ovidio, 338.  Cf. L. Rocca, ^Dei quattro pozzetti dell'
antico battistero di S. Giovanni in Firenzi e dei versi di
Dante, che ad essi si referiscono~, in ^Rendiconti del R.
Istituto lombardo di scienze e lettere~, LII, 454.

{|INFERNO CANTO 20~}

	|Proemio.~ IN the fourth ^bolgia~ we have another instance of
perversion
-- this time perversion of mental sight -- symbolized by
bodily
distortion.  The souls of soothsayers, who misused their great
gift of intelligence to beguile their credulous fellows, have
their heads twisted to the rear, so that they are obliged to
walk
backwards.  They suffer constantly all the agony one would
feel
in the instant of neck-wringing; unable to make a sound, they
pour forth their anguish in tears that flow down their backs. 
The aspect of this strange affliction makes Dante weep, before
he
recognizes any of the sinners; in other words, he is sorry for
the penalty itself, and in so far rebels against God's will. 
For
this, Reason chides him.  'The righteous shall rejoice when he
seeth the vengeance,' says Ps. lviii, 10; and theologians aver
that the fate of the damned should be contemplated, not with
pain, but with satisfaction, as a manifestation of divine
justice.  In the ^Visio S. Pauli~ (ed. H. Brandes, p. 66),
when
St. Paul weeps at the sight of the inferno torments, his
angelic
guide remonstrates: 'Quid ploras?  Vis plus esse misericors
filio
Dei?'  So Virgil finds it necessary to rebuke Dante,
declaring:

     'Qui vive la piet@a quando @e ben morta,'

which probably means: 'Here, in thy grief, pity shows life
when
by rights it is dead'; that is, in Hell there should be no
such
thing as compassion for punishment, and there is none, save
for
thy silly tears.  See D'Ovidio, 77-80.

	A meeting with the prophetess Manto, daughter of the
Theban Tiresias, leads Virgil to launch forth into a lengthy
account of the founding of Mantua, his native place.  The
town,
he affirms was named after this same woman, who, leaving
Thebes,
ended her long wanderings on the spot where it was afterwards
built.  Dante represents himself as listening respectfully but
with only indifferent interest to the narrative, at the close
of
which he eagerly asks about the other souls.  Now, the
peculiar
feature of this incident is that Dante here ascribes to Virgil
quite another story from that indicated in the ^Aeneid~, X,
198-200:

     'Ille etiam patriis agmen ciet Ocnus ab oris
     Fatidicae Mantus et Tusci filius amnis,
     Qui muros matrisque dedit tibi, Mantua, nomen.'

According to this passage, then, it was Ocnus, son of a
river-god
and a presumably different Manto, who built and named Mantua. 
Dante knew of the Theban Manto from Statius; and he may have
read
in St. Isidore's ^Origines~, XV, i, 59, or heard from local
tradition, that it was she who founded Mantua.  At any rate,
he
apparently was convinced that the version of the tale in the
^Aeneid~ was wrong and should be corrected; the correction he
courteously put into the mouth of Virgil himself.  But that is
not all: the 'cruel virgin' involves us in a problem still
more
perplexing.  In ^Purg.~ XXII, 113, Virgil assigns 'la figlia
di
Tiresia' to the Limbus, where he himself dwells.  It is
incredible that our poet should have forgotten where he had
put
Manto, after all the talk about her.  We are almost forced to
the
conclusion that the passage in ^Inf.~ XX was written after the
one in ^Purg.~ XXII, and that Dante neglected to alter the
latter
in accordance with the former.  It is likely that in his first
draft of ^Inf.~ XX he introduced the Etruscan Manto, and
attributed to her the name of Mantua, as the ^Aeneid~ does;
but
later, changing his view, substituted the Theban Manto, and
wrote
the verses as we have them.

	It is clear that in this canto Dante wishes to exonerate
of any imputation of sympathy with magic his master, Virgil,
who
in Naples had and still has the reputation of sorcery, and
perhaps incidentally himself.  Virgil's city was not founded
by
(only named after) the sorceress Manto, and was named without
augury; in its inheritance then, is no taint of magic. 
Virgil's
indignation is aroused by the thought of the part played by
sorcery and soothsaying in the ancient poets.  Indeed, his
present tale of Mantua may be merely an allegorical
interpretation of the passage in the ^Aeneid~ (to wit, the
city
was founded by men who followed Manto and the river), designed
as
a showing-up of old fables.

	For the time-reference at the end of the canto, see the
general note at the beginning of the ^Inferno.~ -- For an
ingenious view of Virgil's attitude toward soothsayers, see
D'Ovidio, 92-112, 118-46; cf. ^Bull.~, X, 225; criticized by
C.
Bernardi, ^Il Virgilio dantesco nella interpretazione critica
di Francesco D'Ovidio~, 1921. -- For Manto and Mantua, see
Moore, I, 173; F. Cipolla in ^Atti del Reale Istituto Veneto~,
LXI, 159; ^Bull.~, XII, 84.  E. K. Rand ^Dante and Servius~ in
^33d Annual Report of the Dante Society of Cambridge, Mass.~,
(1914), 1: Servius, in his commentary on Virgil, makes Ocnus
the
son of the Theban Manto, and gives several stories of the
founding of Mantua.  See also E. G. Parodi in ^Atena e Roma~,
XI
(May-June and July-August, 1918); Pietrobuono, ^Lectura
Dantis~,
in ^La Tribuna~, March 27, 1916. -- See St. Thomas, ^Summa
Theologiae~ Secunda Secundae, Qu. xcv.

{|INFERNO CANTO 21~}

	|Proemio.~ IN nearly all mediaeval portrayals of the lower
world the grotesque runs riot.  Dante, while not discarding
this element, has brought it within narrow bounds.  In
the fifth ^bolgia~, however, he gives free rein to
the comic spirit, which dominates this canto and the
next.  Here, too, he reflects, as nowhere else, the popular
Christian conception of Hell.  As in the ^Visio Sancti Pauli~,
a
devil arrives carrying a lost soul, -- although the damned,
according to Dante's regular plan, should sink unaided to
their
proper place by the weight of their own sin.  The guardians of
this ditch are the roguish fiends of folklore; they are more
or
less individualized, receiving fantastic names.  Their generic
designation is ^Malebranche~, 'Badpaws'; ^Alichino~ is perhaps
the French ^Hallequin~, leader of the Wild Hunt; ^Farfarello~
seems to be a traditional demon-name; ^Barbariccia~,
^Cagnazzo~,
^Graffiacane~, ^Malacoda~, ^Rubicante~ mean respectively
'Curlybeard,' 'Mean Dog,' 'Dogscratcher,' 'Badtail,'
'Rubicund.' 
Some of the appellations appear to be ludicrous distortions of
the names of real people: there was a prominent Malabranca
family
in Rome; the Raffacani were numerous in Florence; a Pietro di
Malacoda is attested; and Torraca cites, among others,
Canasso,
Scaldabrina, Ciriolo, Dragonetto, Biccicocco, Sc@ormiglio,
which
are not unlike ^Cagnazzo~, ^Calcabrina~, ^Ciriatto~,
^Draghignazzo~,
^Libicocco~, ^Scarmiglione.~  The whole humorous interlude,
characterized by coarseness of incident and language, serves
both
to express contempt for the sinners and their earthly judges,
and
to afford a relief from the horrors that precede and follow.

	The peculiarity of swindlers is that they do dirty work
in the dark; and unless they remain under cover, they are
seized
by the officers of the law.  So Dante's barrators, or
grafters,
pursue their eternal career beneath the surface of a ditch
full
of boiling pitch, and demons stand ready to snatch them with
hooks if they attempt to 'air themselves.'  Cunning as they
were
on earth, they still incessantly scheme to cheat and elude
their
watchers; and these, just as tricky and far more vile and
mischievous, are as eager to catch the innocent as the guilty. 
Dante himself barely evades their wiles, even Reason being
temporarily deceived, though human instinct is apprehensive. 
The
poet here introduces a bit of autobiography.  It will be
remembered that in 1302 he was accused (as a pretext for
reprisal) of several crimes, among them barratry committed
when
he was prior, in 1300; and was condemned to death by fire if
taken in Florentine territory.  In reality, then, as in the
^Comedy~, he had a narrow escape from infernal machinations. 
The
mention of the pitch leads to a lifelike description of the
great
arsenal, or shipyard, in Venice, famous during and after the
Middle Ages where the sailors, as is the habit of seafaring
folk
the world over, utilize the enforced idleness of winter to
repair
their damaged craft.

	To entrap Dante and his too confiding guide, the leader
of the Malebranche informs them that though the nearest bridge
over the following valley is broken, the next ridge will
afford
them a safe passage.  This arch was shattered, he says, when
Christ descended into Hell, 1266 years ago yesterday, and five
hours later in the day.  Now Dante, in ^Conv.~, IV, xxiii,
92-110,
after expressing the opinion that the age of thirty-five is
the culminating point of the perfect human life, continues: 'E
movemi questa ragione, che ottimamente naturato fue il nostro
Salvadore Cristo, il quale volle morire nel trentaquattresimo
anno della sua etade; ch@e non era convenevole la Divinit@a
stare
cos@i in discrescere.  N@e da credere @e ch'Egli non volesse
dimorare in questa nostra vita al sommo, poich@e stato c'era
nel
basso stato della puerizia.  E ci@o ne manifesta l'ora del
giorno della sua morte, ch@e volle quella consomigliare colla
vita sua; onde dice Luca che era quasi ora sesta quando
mor@io,
che @e a dire lo colmo del d@i.  Onde si pu@o comprendere per
quello quasi che al trentacinquesimo anno di Cristo era il
colmo
della sua et@a.'  Not only is this argument curiously lame,
but
its very foundation is false, for Luke does not state that
'era
quasi ora sesta' when Christ died.  What he does say (xxiii,
44-5),
after recording the conversation between Jesus and the thief,
is: 'And it was about the sixth hour, and there was a darkness
over all the earth until the ninth hour.  And the sun was
darkened, and the veil of the temple was rent in the midst.' 
Matthew (xxvii 45,46,51) and Mark (xv 33, 34, 38) agree in
putting the crucifixion and the beginning of the darkness at
the
sixth hour (noon), the death and the rending of the veil of
the
temple at the ninth (3 P.M.); and there is nothing in Luke's
vaguer statement that is inconsistent with this.  If Dante
when
he wrote Canto XXI, still adhered to the opinion set forth in
the
^Convivio~, the colloquy between Virgil and the fiend occurred
at
7 A.M., five hours before noon; if, on the other hand, he had
rejected this untenable view, the hour was 10 A.M.  It was, in
any case, the morning of Saturday, April 9, the day following
Good Friday, in the year 1300, counting from the Conception --
1266 years after the death of Christ, who expired, according
to
Dante's belief, at the age of thirty-three, just thirty-four
years after the Conception.  For the devils' names, see
E. G. Parodi in ^Bull.~, XXIII, 25 ff.

{|INFERNO CANTO 22~}

	|Proemio.~ OPENING in mock heroic continuation of the gross theme
immediately preceding, this canto goes on to describe the ways
of
grafters -- who, it would seem, are especially rife in remote
dependencies.  It relates the capture of one of them by the
infernal sleuth-hounds and his clever escape from the
domineering
Barbariccia, the suspicious Cagnazzo, the over-confident
Alichino, the quarrelsome Calcabrina, and their fierce
comrades.

{|INFERNO CANTO 23~}

	|Proemio.~ THE scene just witnessed reminds Dante of a 'favola
d'Isopo,' the story of the frog and the rat.  The tale exists
in
Greek; but the name ^Ysopus~ was given in the Middle Ages to
any
fable collection, and the story in question occurs in several. 
A
frog having offered to tow a rat across a stream, ties itself
to
the animal, jumps in with it, and then treacherously tries to
dive to the bottom expecting to drown its companion.  While
the
rat is struggling to keep afloat, a kite, seeing the
disturbance,
swoops down and carries off both creatures.  The beginning and
the end of the fable, Dante says, are exactly like the recent
episode: that is, the fall of the two grappling fiends into
the
pitch is a reproduction of the plunge of the tethered
quadrupeds
into the water; and their rescue, as they are hooked out by
their
mates, is a counterpart of the seizure of the frog and the rat
by
the kite.

	Our travelers have a narrow escape from the angry devils. 
Virgil, taking Dante in his arms, slides on his back down the
precipitous bank into the sixth ^bolgia~, where they are safe
from pursuit.  They find themselves in the valley of the
hypocrites.  'Woe unto you, scribes and Pharisees,
hypocrites!'
says Mat. xxiii, 27, 'for ye are like unto whited sepulchres,
which indeed appear beautiful outward but are within full of
dead
men's bones, and of all uncleanness.'  Such is Dante's
conception
of hypocrisy.  In slow and solemn file the souls march by --
'gente dipinta,' painted people, beautiful outward with bright
gold.  They are clad in cloaks of the cut affected by the
monks
of Cluny; and these garments, gilded on the outside, are made
of
crushing lead.  Their cowls hang massive and heavy over their
eyes, their heads are bowed down by the weight they can
scarcely
drag themselves along.  Their enforced decorum, measured pace
and
sidelong glances are all in character; and so is the pious
platitude which one of them sententiously volunteers when
Virgil
discovers how he has been tricked by the Malebranche.  The
exact
form of their punishment was probably suggested to Dante by
the
^Magnae Derivationes~ of Uguccione da Pisa, who defines
'ypocrita' as' superauratus,' taking it from {two Greek
words}.

	On the floor of the ditch, pegged down at intervals in
the pathway, where the heavy procession tramples on them as it
passes, are Caiaphas Annas, and the other false councilors who
favored the sacrifice of Christ.  Thinking to destroy him,
they
really crucified their own souls exposing themselves to the
perpetual obloquy of mankind, and assuming the burden of blame
for all subsequent hypocrisy.  Over their ^bolgia~ the bridges
are broken down, shattered by the great earthquake that
accompanied the Saviour's descent.  Here again, in l. 137, the
word ^ruina~ is used.  An impressive picture is that of Virgil
'marveling' over Caiaphas, who was not there at the time of
his
previous journey through Hell.  The crime of this
arch-hypocrite
passes the comprehension of Reason.

	For the 'favola d'Isopo,' see R. McKenzie in ^The
Seventeenth Annual Report of the Dante Society of Cambridge,
Massachusetts~ (1898), pp. 6-13.

	For the lead cape punishment, in tradition and in vision,
see G. L. Hamilton in ^Romanic Review~, XII, 335.  A similar
punishment (not for hypocrisy, but for an angry oath) is
related
by Helinand of Froidmont, as recorded by Vincent de Beauvais,
^Speculum Historiale~ (Venice, 1494), XXIX, cxviii: the soul
of a
clerk appears to a friend, clad in a beautiful lead-colored
cape,
heavier than a tower. -- For hypocrites, see St. Thomas,
^Summa
Theologiae~, Secunda Secundae, Qu. vi, Art. 5: 'they steal a
reputation among men.'

{|INFERNO CANTO 24~}

	|Proemio.~ FOR a moment, thanks to the dainty simile of the frost
with which this canto opens, we are lifted out beneath the
open
sky into the bracing air of winter.  Then the horrors
redouble.
In this seventh ^bolgia~ we are shown the most weird and
blood-
curdling sights that Hell affords.  The thief, when he plies
his
trade, abdicates his human nature and transforms himself into
a
sly, creeping snake.  The serpent, then, is the symbol of
thievery; and so this sin is depicted, through two cantos,
with
an astounding variety of gruesome detail.

	For the shortening nights, see Moore, III, 53 and 150.
For Vanni Fucci, see A. Chiappelli, ^Dalla Trilogia di Dante~,
1905, 226.  For the prophecy at the end of the canto, see F.
Torraca in ^Rassegna critica della letteratura italiana~,
VIII,
1; and, for a different interpretation, A. Bassermann in
^Giorn.
dant.~, XII, 97; cf. Chiappelli, 270-275; see I. Del Lungo in
^Nuova Antologia~, Dec. 16, 1919, p. 341.

{|INFERNO CANTO 25~}

	|Proemio.~ IN a lair on Mt. Aventine dwelt the bloody monster
Cacus, son of Vulcan, whose story Virgil tells in the
^Aeneid~,
VIII, 193-267.  When Hercules returned from the west with
Geryon's
herd, Cacus stole a part of it, dragging the cattle by their
tails,
that their footprints might point away from his den.  Warned
by their
bellowing, Hercules followed them; and although the
fire-belching
Cacus filled the cave with flame and smoke, the hero boldly
entered and strangled him -- according to Dante's version,
which
follows Ovid's, slew him with his club.  Virgil nowhere calls
Cacus a centaur, but he does use the phrase (VIII, 194):
'Semihominis Caci facies.'  A centaur Dante makes him, and
puts
upon his neck a mane of serpents and on his back a fiery
dragon.
Inasmuch as he was guilty of theft, he is separated from the
centaurs of the Circle of Violence and incarcerated in the
seventh ^bolgia~ of the Circle of Fraud.  Presumably he is,
like
his fellows, a sort of guardian as well as a culprit.

	Five other thieves claim our attention -- Agnello, Buoso,
Puccio, Cianfa, Guercio, all Florentines of whom we know
little
or nothing.  The first three are introduced in the aspect of
human beings.  Cianfa darts in as a snake, twists himself
about
Agnello, and combines with him into an indescribable monster
--
'e tal sen g@io con lento passo.'  Guercio then appears in
serpent form, bites Buoso, and gradually exchanges shapes with
him, the one becoming a man, the other a snake.  Puccio
remains
intact.

	Some strange effects of snake-bites Dante learned from
Lucan's ^Pharsalia~, IX, 761 ff.  Certain details of his
transformations he evidently drew from Ovid's ^Metamorphoses~:
in
IV, 576 ff., Cadmus is turned into a serpent; in IV, 451 ff.,
a
boy who laughs at Ceres becomes a lizard; in IV, 356 ff., a
youth
and a naiad are fused into an Hermaphrodite.  But the
sustained
realism, the atmosphere of deep mystery and horror, the
uncanny
yawn, stare, and smoke are Dante's own.

	See E. Ciafardini, ^Nella bolgia dei ladri~, in
^Rendiconti della R. Accademia dei Lincei~, XXXII, ff. 11-12. 
-- For Ovid's version of the Cacus story see ^Fasti~, I, 569. 
It
is possible that in this canto, Dante, convinced that Ovid is
right, makes Virgil correct himself.

{|INFERNO CANTO 26~}

	|Proemio.~ ONCE more a respite is afforded from the
oppressiveness of Malebolge.  Ulysses tells of
his last journey, and his sea-story breaks in upon the grim
nightmare like a whiff of fresh breeze.  This 'mad flight' of
the
Ithacan out into the great waters seems to be essentially an
invention of our poet.  Although Solinus records an old
tradition
that Ulysses sailed into the Atlantic and founded Lisbon and
Claudian mentions a voyage to a land of shades in that part of
Gaul which projects furthest into the ocean, their tales have
almost nothing in common with his.  Dante's imagination must
have
been stirred by the adventures of St. Brendan in his search
for
the Isles of the Blest, and by other yarns of wondrous voyages
and expeditions to the Earthly Paradise; but he imitates none
of
them in this narrative.  Homer he had not read.

	Ulysses is found in the eighth ^bolgia~, among evil
counsellors, those who applied their burning eloquence to the
concealment of their real mind.  They are completely enveloped
in
tongues of fire, which 'steal' them from sight, just as in
life
their flaming speech cunningly hid their thought.  Fire, the
symbol of divine anger, is an appropriate punishment, because
their sin consists in the misuse of superior mental power, the
direct gift of God, who breathes into men at birth the
intellective soul endowed witb greater or less keenness of
intelligence according to his grace.  Dante, one of the most
favored in this respect, manifests particular interest in the
fate of his intellectual compeers, and warns himself against
falling into the error that wrought their destruction.

	See M. Porena, ^Il Canto d'Ulisse~ in ^Rivista
d'Italia~, Sept. 1902; I. Sanesi, ^L'ultima navigazione
d'Ulisse~, 1919; ^Stud. dant.~, VI, 18 (Seneca in an epistle
raises
the question whether Ulysses traveled beyond the known world);
A.
H. Gilbert, ^Dante's Conception of Justice~, 1925, p. 103
(expresses the opinion that the sinners of this canto are
tricksters rather than evil counselors; but see XXVII, 116).

{|INFERNO CANTO 27~}

	|Proemio.~ GUIDO DA MONTEFELTRO, the great Ghibelline general, was
one of the foremost Italians of the 13th century.  He was
famous
for his valor, wisdom, courtesy, and especially for his skill
in
strategy, which won for him the name of 'fox.'  Dante's story
of
his final seduction by Boniface VIII, to whom he was induced,
by
promise of absolution, to give the evil counsel of taking
Palestrina by false pledges, is corroborated by the chronicle
of
Pipino, written in 1314.  The discoverv of this early account
would seem to settle the much debated question whether the
incident was invented by the poet.

	What Dante probably did invent is a struggle between
Heaven and Hell for the possession of Guido's soul.  St.
Francis
of Assisi, to whose order Guido belonged, comes to claim the
departing spirit; but he is opposed by 'one of the black
cherubim,' who, after a brief discussion, is victorious.  Such
a
conflict occurs in the ^Commedia~ in only one other case, that
of
Guido's son Buonconte, whose tale is told in ^Purg.~ V, 88 ff. 
In both instances the theme is introduced to emphasize an
important doctrine, namely, that the eternal fate of a soul
depends on its intrinsic condition at the moment of death. 
Though absolved by a Pope, Guido had not genuinely repented of
his last misdeed, and therefore the absolution was invalid. 
Buonconte, on the other hand, though neglectful of his
religious
duties during life, has, when mortally wounded, an instant of
true repentance and love of God, and thus wins salvation.  The
two contrasted examples are as extreme as the poet could
contrive
them, and they are the more striking in that the two men are
father and son.

	For Pipino's text, see Torraca, p. 225.  For a discussion
of
the episode: D'Ovidio, 202, 533; E. Gorra, ^Il soggettivismo
di
Dante~, 43-59; H. Honig, ^Guido da Montefeltro~ (reviewed in
^Giorn. stor.~, XXXIX, 422); G. Petraglione in ^Giorn. dant.~,
XI, 136.  For other early mention of the incident, ^Giorn.
stor.~
LVIII, 270, and A. F. Mass@era, ^Il 'consiglio frodolente' di
Guido da Montefeltro secondo una nuova fonte storica~, 1911
(cf.
^Bull.~ XVIII, 266).  See also F. Torraca, ^Studi danteschi~,
1912, p. 305.

{|INFERNO CANTO 28~}

	|Proemio.~ AN involved simile, at the beginning of this canto, calls
up the picture of a vast accumulation of maimed bodies
gathered
through the centuries, from the many battlefields of southern
Italy.  Even this mangled host conveys but a faint idea of the
ninth ^bolgia.~  Creators of strife are here hacked by the
sword
of a fiend, as they pass by; their horribly dissevered state
represents the life of bloodshed and dissension which they
loved. 
Conspicuous among them are Mahomet, the Roman Curio, Mosca de'
Lamberti of Florence and the Proven$cal warrior-poet Bertran
de
Born.

	Some of Dante's contemporaries believed Mahomet to have
been originally not only a Christian, but a cardinal and an
aspirant to the papacy;.  The poet, then, was justified in
regarding him and his son-in-law Ali as the leaders of a great
schism in the Christian Church.

	The tribune Curio, banished from Rome, fled to Caesar
who was hesitating on the bank of the Rubicon, and 'sunk the
doubt' within him by urging him to march on the capital.  The
event is narrated by Lucan in ^Pharsalia~, I, 266 ff.  He now
wishes he had never seen Rimini, near which town the Rubicon
empties into the Adriatic.

	In 1215 a Buondelmonte, who was betrothed to a lady of
the Amidei family, was induced to jilt her and appear on his
wedding day with a bride from the house of the Donati.  The
Amidei came together to discuss the best way to avenge this
affront.  Some advised inflicting on Buondelmonte a beating or
a
wound in the face.  Mosca, however, affirmed that such an
attack
would result in more harm to the aggressors than to the
victim. 
'Cosa fatta capo ha,' he declared -- 'a thing once done has an
end': if we do him a hurt, let it be a final one.  The Amidei
followed his counsel and murdered the offender.  Hence arose
the
feud between the families and, according to local tradition,
the
first conflict between Guelfs and Ghibellines in Florence. 
The
Lamberti, to whom Mosca belonged, were afterwards banished
from
the city and never allowed to return.

	Bertran de Born was a Proven$cal poet of the latter part
of the 12th century.  To further his private ends, he took
advantage of the disputes and wars of Henry II of England and
his
two elder sons, Henry and Richard, who had extensive
possessions
in southern France.  According to his old Proven$cal
biography,
which considerably exaggerates his political importance,
Bertran
was active in fomenting their quarrels, and formed a close
friendship with the younger Henry.  This prince was crowned in
his father's lifetime, and was consequently known as 'the
young
English king.'  His early death in 1183 was mourned by Bertran
in
verse that gained wide renown.

	Curio is mentioned in one of Dante's letters, Ep. VII.

	For Bertran, see Hayden Boyers, ^Cleavage in Bertran de
Born and Dante~, in ^Modern Philology~, XXIV, 1; J. L.
Perrier,
^Bertran de Born, Patriot, and his Place in Dante's Inferno~,
in ^Romanic Review~, XI, 223.

	The story of Mahomet as Cardinal is found in the ^Chiose
anonime all'Inferno~, written about the time of Dante's death
and published in 1865 and 1900.  It occurs also in the Old
French
^Penart le Contrefait~, Part II, of the first half of the 14th
century: Vincent de Beauvais, ^Speculum Historiale~, Lib.
XXII,
Cap. 51, regards Mahomet as a Christian and a schismatic but
not
a Cardinal.  So does the ^Ottimo Commento.~  See J. S. P.
Tatlock, ^Mohammed and his Followers~ in ^Dante~, in ^Modern
Language Review~, XXVII, 186.

{|INFERNO CANTO 29~}

	|Proemio.~ THE sight of the sowers of discord exercises a curious
fascination on the beholder, who gazes on their 'strange
wounds'
with 'drunken eyes' until he is brought to his senses by a
reproof from Virgil.  In other words, Dante, who was himself
prone to strife, in his contemplation of this sin is beginning
to
feel more satisfaction than abhorrence, and needs to be warned
by
Reason that he is not meditating in the proper spirit.  A
similar
lapse is described at the end of the next canto.  Dante
attempts
to justify his eagerness by the statement that he was
searching
for the shade of Geri del Bello, a first cousin of his father,
who is punished in this ditch.  The early commentators give
Geri
a black character; but we really know little of him except
that
his house was damaged by the Ghibellines in 1260, that he
received compensation for it from the Guelfs in 1269, and that
he
was killed by one of the Sacchetti.  The resulting feud
between
the families was ended by a reconciliation in 1342.  In 1300
his
death, to Dante's shame, was still unavenged.  Vengeance for a
relative's murder was regarded, in spite of Christian
teaching,
as a part of a gentleman's duty.  This doctrine is explicitly
laid down by Brunetto Latini in his ^Tesoretto~, XVIII.  Dante
himself wrote, in Canzone XII, 83:

     'Ch@e bell' onor s' acquista in far vendetta.'

Forese Donati, in his third sonnet to Dante, derisively said
to
him:

     'Ben so che fosti figliuol d' Allaghieri,
     E accorgomene pur alla vendetta
     Che facesti di lui s@i bella e netta.'

	The tenth valley -- the last of Malebolge -- contains
falsifiers of all kinds.  Those described fall into four
classes:
falsifiers of metals, or alchemists; falsifiers of persons, or
impersonators; falsifiers of coin, or counterfeiters;
falsifiers
of words, or liars.  It is to be noted that the alchemists
here
confined are damned as cheats, not as disturbers of God's
creation.  The sin of all these culprits is symbolized by
devastating disease, which alters their appearance: as they
tried
to change the aspect of things, so are they transformed by
loathsome maladies.

	See I. Del Lungo, ^Dal secolo e dal poema di Dante~,
1898, p. 65 (^Una vendetta in Firenze~).

{|INFERNO CANTO 30~}

	|Proemio.~ FALSE personation is represented by Myrrha of Cyprus and
Gianni Schicchi of Florence; counterfeiting, by the counts of
Romena and their agent, Master Adam; lying, by Potiphar's wife
and Sinon the Greek.  Before leaving this valley, Dante,
listening to a vulgar altercation, shows the same weakness for
which he was rebuked in the preceding canto.

{|INFERNO CANTO 31~}

	|Proemio.~ AS the poets cross the broad bank that intervenes between
the tenth ^bolgia~ and the great central pit of Hell, Dante
sees
looming through the dusk, like the towers of a city, the forms
of
giants, visible from the waist up all around the mouth of the
well.  As far as we can judge, they are from sixty to eighty
feet
in total height.  But the apparently precise dimensions given
are
vague to us, because of the variability of standards: one
creature measures from neck to midde thirty palms, probably
something like twenty feet; another, five ells, perhaps some
thirty feet.  One of these monsters, Antaeus, picks up the
travelers and sets them on the ice at the bottom of the hole.
Dante speaks as if he did so without quitting his post;
nothing
but the giant's stoop is described, as he lifts them up, and
his
straightening when he has put them down.  We are told,
however,
that, unlike his mates, he is not bound.  Now, inasmuch as the
last ^bolgia~ is eleven miles in circumference, and inasmuch
as
the poets walk for some time over the plain of ice before
seeing,
in the midde of it, the enormous figure of Lucifer, we must
think
of this pit as at least a mile wide; and since it is described
in
XVIII, 5, as 'un pozzo assai largo e ^profondo~,' it can
hardly
be less than twice as deep as it is broad.  It is obvious,
then,
that the giants, the upper half of whose bodies appears above
the
edge, cannot be standing on the bottom: their feet must rest
on a
ledge or shelf near the top of the wall; in fact, in XXXII,
16-7,
we are told that when Dante and Virgil were on the bottom of
the
'pozzo scuro,' they were, 'sotto i pi@e del gigante, e assai
pi@u
bassi.'  Antaeus, therefore, carrying the poets, must have
left
his place and climbed down the precipice; but of this descent
our
author, for reasons of his own, says not a word.  Perhaps he
conceived of himself as so terrified hat he could recall
nothing
of the adventure but its awful beginning and end.  It is
likely,
too, that he preferred to leave a gap for the reason set forth
in
the argument to Canto V.

	We do not know how many giants there are in all.  Those
named are Nimrod, Ephialtes, Briareus, and Antaeus -- all,
except
the last damned for their presumption in attempting to scale
Heaven.  Ephialtes and Briareus were among the most active at
Phlegra when the giants piled mountain upon mountain, and
threatened the Gods.  This combat is mentioned by Ovid
(^Met.~,
I, 151-5), Statius (^Theb.~, II, 595-6), and Lucan (^Phars.~,
IV,
593-7); and the two latter authorities speak of Briareus. 
Ephialtes is not named by any of the ancient poets that Dante
seems to have known, but he is to be found in Servius's
commentary on the ^Georgics~ I, 180.  Antaeus, so Lucan tells
us
(^Phars.~, IV, 597), did not participate in the fight, and
therefore he is unbound in Dante's Hell; in ^Phars.~ IV, 593
ff.,
his misdeeds and his defeat by Hercules are related at length. 
The 'fable' of the battle of Phlegra doubtless represented to
Dante merely the old pagan sages' idea of the revolt of the
angels; the giants are stricken down by 'il sommo Giove,' the
supreme Power.  The Biblical Nimrod, then, is not out of place
among them.  The following particulars are culled from Gen. x,
8-10, and xi, 2-9, also vi, 4: 'And Cush begat Nimrod: he
began
to be a mighty one in the earth.  He was a mighty hunter
before
the Lord....  And the beginning of his kingdom was Babel, and
Erech, and Accad, in the land of Shinar....  And it came to
pass
... that they found a plain in the land of Shinar; and they
dwelt
there....  And they said, Go to, let us build us a city and a
tower, whose top may reach unto heaven....  So the Lord
scattered
them abroad from thence upon the face of all the earth: and
they
left off to build the city.  Therefore is the name of it
called
Babel.'  Nimrod, then, was held responsible for the audacious
enterprise; and as early as Orosius and St. Augustine he was
regarded by Christians as a giant.  According to ^De Vulgari
Eloquentia~, I, vii, 24-31, it was' sub persuasione gigantis'
that man presumed to surpass his maker.  In the confusion of
tongues Dante's Nimrod has suffered more than his misguided
fellows, for he speaks a language understood by no one else
and
can comprehend no other soul.  His mind, too, is as dazed as
his
words are senseless.  He can vent his feelings only by blowing
the big horn with which, as a 'mighty hunter,' he is equipped.

{|INFERNO CANTO 32~}

	|Proemio.~ THE manifold crimes of the Lower Hell are due to pride
and envy, and these sins are personified in Satan and the
giants.
Embedded in the central point of his kingdom, the arch-sinner,
surrounded by a ring of fellow-rebels, holds his eternal
court. 
The spirits that thought to rise so high are sunken at the
bottom
of the universe; their monstrous forms are fixed and impotent
forevermore.  This rather than the Circle of Violence, is
artistically their fit place; and here, no doubt, Dante would
have put them, even if Virgil had not pointed the way (^Aen.~,
VI, 580-1):

     'Hic genus antiquum terrae, Titania pubes,
     Fulmine dejecti, fundo volvuntur in imo.'

	For the ^pozzo~, cf. G. Agnelli in ^Giorn. dant.~, VIII,
546. -- Why are Satan and the giants placed among the
treacherous?  Perhaps because, created beautiful and strong,
they
turned against their Creator.

	The hardest, coldest heart is that of the traitor; from
it all the warmth of human affection has been banished.  The
symbol of treachery is ice; and at the bottom of the well,
buried
in the circular plain formed by the freezing of Cocytus, are
the
sinners of the ninth and last circle.  In the middle of the
plain, at the centre of the earth, is Lucifer or Satan, called
Dis by the ancients.  Ice is used as a means of punishment in
other visions of Hell, and in the ^Visio Alberici~ we find a
graded immersion in ice; but nowhere else has it the
significance
that our poem gives it.  Dante's traitors have no desire to be
remembered on earth: the best they can hope is to be
forgotten. 
Their evil disposition is unchanged, and even in Hell they are
eager to betray one another.  The cold, cruel spirit that
pervades their congregation communicates itself to the
beholder;
the mere thought of their odious crimes arouses an instinct of
vindictiveness.  Scorn and hatred possess Dante as he
contemplates them, and he feels impelled to pay them in their
own
coin.

	The traitors fall into four divisions, according to the
relation between themselves and their victims.  They are
arranged
in the round plain in four concentric circles; taking them in
order, from {^Caina~ and ^Antenora~ lacking} ^Tolom@ea~
('Ptolemea'), ^Giudecca~ ('Judecca ').  They are distinguished
only by the position of the sinners in the ice: in the first
three,
the souls are embedded up to their heads; in the last,
Giudecca, they are entirely covered.  In Caina, the heads
are bowed down; in Antenora they are apparently
erect; in Tolomea they are thrown back.  Caina contains
traitors
to kindred, Antenora traitors to country or party, Tolomea
traitors to guests, Giudecca traitors to benefactors (or,
according to Del Lungo, to constituted authorities).  In all
cases the treachery involves murder.  Caina and Giudecca are
named respectively for Cain and Judas.  Antenora derives its
title from the Trojan Antenor, who bears an excellent
character
in the ^Iliad~; in the later narratives, however, ascribed to
Dares and Dictys, and regarded in the Middle Ages as an
authentic
account, he figures as the arch-traitor who hands over the
Palladium to the Greeks (cf. Servius's commentary on ^Aen.~,
I,
242).  Tolomea is so called after the Ptolemy of I Macc. xvi,
11-6, a captain of Jericho, who murdered his father-in-law and
two brothers-in-law at a banquet to which he had invited them. 

{|INFERNO CANTO 33~}

	|Proemio.~ IN this canto occurs an episode second only to that of
Francesca da Rimini in its appeal to popular sympathy.  It is
in
Antenora that Dante hears from Count Ugolino the frightful
story
of his death.  Here, as in the case of the 'injured souls' of
Francesca
and her lover, the poet is stirred to the depths by the wrong
done on earth to the lost sinner.  Francesca's fate moves him
to
an agony of pity not unmixed with indignation; that of Ugolino
and his children kindles in him even more wrath than
compassion. 
In the two narratives we find the same exclusion of all detail
that might blur the one overwhelming impression to be produced
upon the reader; in both, the same concentration on that part
of
the experience to which no human heart can be indifferent.  As
Francesca's guilty love follows her to Hell and binds her
forever
to the partner of her sin, so Ugolino is coupIed to the object
of
his just hate, on whom he wreaks eternal vengeance.

	Ugolino della Gherardesca, count of Donoratico, belonged
to an old and powerful family and held vast estates in western
Tuscany.  Inasmuch as he was vicar, in Sardinia, of King Enzo
(son of Frederick II) and married his eldest son to Enzo's
daughter, he must have been originally of the Imperial
faction;
but as early as 1275 he for some reason allied himself to the
Tuscan Guelfs against Pisa, which was then Ghibelline.  It was
doubtless for this political treason that Dante condemned him
to
Antenora.  His party was successful, and he secured
readmission
to the city.  In fact, after 1284 he governed Pisa for the
Guelfs, at first alone, later in company with his grandson,
Nino
Visconti, who appears in ^Purg.~ VIII, 53.  But the Pisan
Ghibellines, led by the turbulent and intriguing Archbishop
Ruggieri degli Ubaldini, -- who in 1288 plotted to surrender
his
city to the Genoese, and then broke faith with them, --
revolted
in that same year against the Guelf control.  Ugolino was
absent
at the time, and Nino was driven from the town.  In June
Ugolino
was invited to confer with the Ghibelline leaders.  He
returned
to Pisa and held parley with the archbishop.  Suddenly an
alarm
was given, and the Ghibellines, with a frenzied mob led by
Ruggieri, attacked their opponents, whom they finally besieged
in
the city hall and, after severe fighting, captured.  Ugolino
was
incarcerated with two of his sons, Gaddo and Uguccione, and
two
grandsons, Ugolino or Nino (called 'il Brigata ') and
Anselmuccio
the children of Guelfo, his firstborn.  After some months the
door of their jail was nailed up, and they were left to
starve. 
When their bodies were taken out, several days after their
death,
they were found to be badly rat-bitten; and a couple of old
chroniclers declare that the unfortunate prisoners had eaten
one
another's flesh, or, more specifically, their hands and arms. 
It
was perhaps a desire to explain the mutilation in a more
fitting
way that led Dante to conceive of Ugolino, in his intolerable
anguish, as gnawing his own hands.  Nevertheless some modern
commentators have imagined that Dante intended, in the last
verse
of Ugolino's speech, to imply that the bereaved father was
driven
to cannibalism.

	Treachery to a traitor was thought to be not only
permissible, but meritorious; and this belief is illustrated
by
Dante's treatment of one of the wretches in Tolomea.  To be
rude
to him, he avers, was the part of true courtesy.  In this
division of the ninth circle are those who assassinated their
own
guests.  Such betrayal as this severs all social bonds and
puts
the betrayer outside the pale of humanity.  Dante expresses
this
idea allegorically by a startling device, which at the same
time
enables him to place in his lower world two or three heinous
offenders still alive in 1300.  As soon as this crime is
committed, -- so we are informed, -- the sinner's soul
descends
to Hell, leaving the body, which, however, seems to remain
alive,
being occupied by a devil during the remainder of its natural
term of existence.  Thus it is written of Judas, at the Last
Supper: 'after the sop Satan entered into him' (John xiii,
27). 
In Ps. lv, 15 it is said of treacherous friends, 'let them
descend quick (i.e., alive) into hell.'

	For a masterly discussion of this canto, see D'Ovidio,
3; see also F. De Sanctis ^L'Ugolino di Dante~ in his ^Nuovi
saggi critici~, 1893 (6th ed.).  For trustworthy information
about Ugolino, whose story has been much garbled, see Torraca. 
For
the attitude of Dante's contemporaries toward treachery to a
traitor, see Torrraca, note to l. 150.  For tales of bodies
possessed
by demons, see A. Graf, ^Miti, leggende e superstizioni del
medio evo~, II, 99; also Caesarius Heisterbacensis, ^Dialogus
Miraculorum~, XII, 4; and John of Salisbury, ^Policratus~,
III,
viii....

{|INFERNO CANTO 34~}

	|Proemio.~ THE souls in the fourth division of the last circle are
entirely covered by the frozen lake, through which they are
seen
like bits of straw blown into glass.  They lie pell-mell in
the
ice, some curled up, some horizontal, some vertical -- these
last
with head or feet upward, as they chanced to fall.  Three
sinners
only -- the worst of all humankind -- have a different and
more
awful fate: they are crunched by the three mouths of Satan
himself.  Judas sold Christ, the founder of the Church; Brutus
and Cassius betrayed Caesar, the founder of the Empire. 
Church
and Empire being co-ordinate powers, divinely established for
the
spiritual and temporal government of men, their founders were
both sacred.  But inasmuch as the spiritual kingdom is holier
than the temporal, and inasmuch as Jesus was not only man but
God, treason to Christ is wickeder than treason to the merely
human Caesar.  Judas, then, is more tortured than his two
companions; his back is rent by Satan's claws, and his head is
inside the demon's mouth, while his legs, like those of the
Simonists, dangle outside.  He is chewed by the red face of
Love
of Evil, whereas Brutus and Cassius, head downward, hang
respectively from the black face of Ignorance and the sallow
face
of Impotence.

	In this Giudecca, the home of betrayers of their
benefactors,
the central figure is the arch-traitor and arch-ingrate,
Lucifer. 
Here he fell when he was cast headlong from Heaven,
and here he will remain, huge, hideous, and impassive,
through all eternity. 'How art thou fallen from heaven, O
Lucifer, son of the morning! how art thou cut down to the
ground,
which didst weaken the nations!  For thou hast said in thine
heart, I will ascend to heaven, I will exalt my throne above
the
stars of God: I will sit also upon the mount of the
congregation,
in the sides of the north: I will ascend above the heights of
the
clouds; I will be like the Most High.  Yet thou shalt be
brought
down to hell, to the sides of the pit' (Isaiah xiv, 12-15). 
Christian interpretation applied these verses not only to an
earthly ruler, but to a fallen angel as well.  They naturally
linked themselves to Luke x, 18: 'And he said unto them I
beheld
Satan as lightning fall from heaven'; and to Rev. xii, 7-9:
'And
there was war in heaven: Michael and his angels fought against
the dragon; and the dragon fought and his angels, and
prevailed
not; neither was their place found any more in heaven.  And
the
great dragon was cast out, that old serpent, called the Devil,
and Satan, which deceiveth the whole world: he was cast out
into
the earth and his angels were cast out with him.'

	Taken together, these passages corroborate the ancient
tradition of the revolt and fall of the angels (cf. the note
to
III, 7), and at the same time furnish ground for an
identification of Lucifer with Satan, the Devil, the Serpent,
and
the Dragon.  As we shall see from 1. 127, Dante regarded
Beelzebub as still another name for the same demon.

	In spite of the abundance of realistic detail that makes
us share with Dante the experiences of this canto, we must
consider his portrayal of Satan as essentially allegorical. 
His
Devil is the image of sin, the principle of evil, the negative
counterpart of God, who is the principle of good.  As the
Godhead
comprises three persons, -- Father, Son, and Holy Ghost,
representing the three attributes, Power, Wisdom, and Love, --
so
Lucifer is pictured three-faced: his red visage betokens Love
of
Evil, or Hate; the black face is the emblem of Ignorance, the
opposite of Wisdom and the source of pride; the pale yellow
one
signifies Impotence, the opposite of Power and the begetter of
envy.  Del Lungo sees in the three faces also a symbol of the
three continents of the earth.  Just as the Holy Ghost, or
Love,
continualiy proceeds from Father and Son, so, in Satan, Hate
is
the result of ignorant Pride and impotent Envy.  Dante's
Lucifer,
though less grotesque and fantastic than the usual diabolical
monster of vision literature, is ugly beyond description. 
Like
the four beasts surrounding God's throne in Rev. iv, 8, and
like
the seraphim of Isaiah vi, 2, he has six wings; a pair of them
sprouts beneath each face, and the three winds produced by
their
flapping freeze Cocytus.  Immovable and helpless in the ice of
his own making he holds sway over his 'doloroso regno' -- so
it
would seem -- by these winds alone.  They are the Satanic
instigations, the inspiration of sin.  Presumably they
correspond
to the three great divisions of Hell, the 'tre disposizion che
'l
ciel non vuole' of XI, 81-3.  From the wings of Love of Evil
issues the blast of Fraud or Malice; from the wings of
Ignorance,
the blast of Violence or Bestiality; from the wings of
Impotence,
the wind of Incontinence or weakness to resist the passions. 
In
Eph. ii, 2, Satan is called "Prince of the power of the air.'

	Having explored all the manifestations of sin, and having
finally scrutinized its very essence, Dante, with the help of
Reason, turns his back upon it and laboriously wrests himself
from its attraction.  That is the allegory of the long and
uneventful climb from the bottom of Hell, at the earth's
centre,
out to the surface on the other side: it is the steady,
monotonous effort by which the remorseful wrongdoer is weaned
from evil practices.  In this journey Dante has no light to
guide
him -- only the encouraging murmur of a streamlet of discarded
sin (perhaps the tears of penitence), flowing constantly from
Purgatory, where wickedness is washed away, down to its
original
Satanic source.

	When the practice of evil has been brought to a stop,
there still remains the duty of penitentially restoring the
soul
to its first purity and cleansing it of all disposition to
sin.
This discipline is symbolized by the ascent through the
torments
of the mountain of Purgatory, a task which is performed in the
light and under heavenly direction.

	For Dante's conception of Caesar, see note to IV, 123.
For other portrayals of a three-faced or three-headed Satan,
see:
A. Graf, ^Miti, leggende e superstizioni del medio evo~, II,
93; R. T. Holbrook, ^Dante and the Animal Kingdom~, 74-5; also
the figure of Satan in the mosaic of the Last Judgment in the
Florentine Baptistery (E. H. Wilkins in ^Speculum~, II, i),
which
has three mouths (two of them issuing from the ears) with
three
sinners, the front one with his head inside, the other two
with
their heads hanging.

	For the passage of the centre, see G. Federzoni in
^Fanfulla della Domenica~, XXXII, 29.  For the outlet from
Hell, see F. D'Ovidio in ^Rivista d'Italia~, XIII, 701; cf. C.
H. Grandgent in ^29th Annual Report of the Dante Society of
Cambridge, Mass.~ (1912), p. 39.
